[Daily Discussion] Sunday, May 27, 2018 -- TITLE
#New post: [\[Daily Discussion\] Monday, May 28, 2018 →](https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8mnaib/daily_discussion_monday_may_28_2018/)
Price goes sideways without doing shit for hours, someone sells over a thousand BTC and 30k (and counting) ETH and all of that gets bought up and we actually inch up a little? 

I'm so glad I don't do short-term trades any more, this is insanity. 
Bitcoin \- wrecking tight stops since forever.
Have a long order open at 7011 over night. Lets see if it is filled tomorrow when I wake up. On the one hand I hope so, on the other hand I fear so...
I'm long from CA 7,260, I plan on adding to it if we continue to drop. I'm trying to think longer term so I can peel my eyes away from the charts during the day and stop getting chopped up / stopped out in the noise. I'm sure if I'm patient enough, I'll be able to close at a profit eventually, even if it's just on a big relief rally and we later go to.goblin town. Looking for a good time to switch from my position from perps to the September futures.


So the weekly has closed under the 50 week MA for the first time in 3 years, giving us a strong bearish signal. That being said, we're in heavily oversold territory, so I'm expecting some sort of bounce/BGD in the short\-term, despite being medium\-term bearish. 

Currently not in a position, but I will probably wait till we see 6.8\-7.1k, and open a scalping long from there. If we bounce now before dropping further I will start scaling in a short, my target for a bounce is around 7.7\-7.8k
is everyone a bear right now?   There's gotta be a place to get long somewhere here.  We dropped straight down 30%.


[Last time weekly closed below the 50MA, we stayed there for over a year](https://i.imgur.com/p9xuRIj.png)

EDIT: This is the third time in Bitcoin history that we would close below the weekly 50MA. So both 2014 and 2011, when this happened, led to another %50+ drop. If history repeats a third time, we'll see $3k

ALSO: 1W RSI is close to making a new low at around 43. If that happens, we'll get to oversold pretty quick.
So the 1h b-bands are very very tight, I expect a large move soon. Probably down because it seems like we can’t get a break. I’ve also noticed that volume seems to be a bit higher on average in the last 12 hours than it was previously, idk what to make of that.



We still have some room to go down as well. 6900 seems to be the bottom of the large equilibrium pattern that we’re all watching, if we bounce there we will have a good r/r for a long in my opinion. 



We’re about to close under the 50W MA for the first time since June 2014, which would be extremely bearish and would also be a sell signal for me. Combine that with a breakdown of the symmetrical triangle that might happen anytime, and we’ve got a year-long bear market on our hands.



Yesterday I said I would sell immediately but that was irresponsible to consider doing that so I have decided to wait and see if those two sell signals I have seen are actually going to happen. 


I know my flair says long term holder but if there’s such a good chance that I could sell now and buy back much cheaper in the future then I might as well try and do that.
Wow. Classic stop hunt. Didn't even wait for two minutes to pass after the wick to crash the price. You gotta give it to these guys. They're good at what they do.
~~have not printed a new low~~, shorts are in fact increasing, we are at major support... what could possibly go wrong? :)
It always surprise me that this is basically the own real trading thread on all cryptosubs. For some reason a lot of people have only experienced bull markets so they spam hodl memes or they go with the "just buy now ta tea leaves" arguments. I really enjoy reading all kinds of opinions here

Not really sure why it's like that,  trading stocks or forex is considered a skill and no one would ever downvote or call you a "JPY shill" for taking any kind of position.

 And that people can not see that a directional bias(short vs long) is something bad, that actually surprise me even more since that's also going on here :D Same with "I would never buy coin X", if the market is giving you an opportunity you should take it, otheriwise you are a biased, and bad trader.

https://www.marketwatch.com/story/why-jesse-livermore-who-made-a-mint-in-the-crash-of-1929-would-buy-bitcoin-today-2017-10-13

I end this rantish message I wrote because the market is slow by a quote from Reminiscence of a stock operator

>• Ignore the long-term fundamentals; just look at the current price action. “When a man makes his play in a commodity market, he must not permit himself set opinions. He must have an open mind and flexibility. It is not wise to disregard the message of the tape, no matter what your opinion of crop conditions or of the probable demand may be.”


https://twitter.com/PeterLBrandt/status/1000738424461058050

so peter took a poll! 10k votes so perhaps a bit more varied than my polls.

> Will the entire crypto category prove to be just one big popcorn trade with prices of most coins returning to at least pre June 2017 levels?

>34% Yes -- slip sliding away

>46% No -- lows are very near

>20% Who cares

10,208 votes

so plurality still bullish. he probably has non-crypto people who voted the 20% so I'd say it's safe to assume majority of crypto people are bullish
I'm leaning bullish here but still mindful of one more step down to keep longs on their toes. MACD and RSI on 4HR-1D point us upwards and history suggests an incoming long dildo of either the red or green persuasion. I think if we're going to go down in the short term it would have to be before that 12hr macd flips. What's everyone having? 7k, 7.6k or something else?
Anyone seeing this pair of bots on GDAX buying and selling 0.001 BTC?
Crossed under 365 day MA first time since august 2014, last time price went down more than 60% after crossing and we stayed below it for 14 months
Honestly, this thread is full of emotions. Stay agnostic to your charts. Sentiment is right where it needs to be, for whatever may come. 
I am thinking  we either get a huge upshot in the next hour or two or no action until the 6am/utc drop. I will keep my short open.

[https://imgur.com/a/q5t8pm6](https://imgur.com/a/q5t8pm6) 
Am I the only one seeing this bot-insanity on GDAX?  Thousands and thousands of 0.001 buys and sells at the same time.  

To Clarify: This is not normal bot behavior.  This is literally hundreds PER SECOND of 0.001 in both directions simultaneously.  Glitchy as all get-out.
reposting this, since I ended up posting it at the end of the old daily

i think polo is dying. the volume is non-existent

24 hour volume for their top 10 coins(and frankly I believe most of this volume is just arbitrage bots and not actual traders):

* ETH: 451 BTC
* MAID: 289 BTC
* Ripple: 184 BTC
* Monero: 160 BTC
* Dash: 158 BTC
* Primecoin: 152 BTC
* LTC: 117 BTC
* BCH: 112 BTC
* Stellar: 90 BTC
* ARDR: 73 BTC

this is frankly pathetic. By comparison, Binance did 7000 BTC volume for ETH. In fact, for ETH, Poloniex is the 90th exchange by volume.

this is such a sad sight to see considering Polo was one of the great ones just a few years back. Frankly they need to switch to 0% market maker fees just to stay competitive. 
Kraken down for anyone else?
Hey guys. Can you please take a look. Something huge is gonna happen in the next days. https://www.tradingview.com/x/PX5j2z4N/


GDAX increased their fee from 0.25&#37; to 0.30&#37;?! Are they out of their minds?! It was already super high because it's nearly impossible to get to a lower tier due to massive volume requirements and they increased it even further? WTF?!
Closed my 3x short from [7555](https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8m7np4/daily_discussion_saturday_may_26_2018/dzmbgss/) around 7280. A 12% increase in stack means I can enjoy this wonderful sunday without worrying about the market!

I'm not putting my money behind this, but we've stopped in the middle of the downtrend which is not nice. The new lower low is only slightly lower than the last. I see much analysis indicating a possible reversal around the rising support line around ~6900 at the moment, and I'm thinking if so many are expecting a bump we might not get there, or just wick so fast I won't be able to act on it.
I noticed a pretty hefty increase in shorts this morning, probably due to the fact that we moved below the 365d MA as /u/nor3g pointed out.

https://www.tradingview.com/x/bZWHiSgd/

I'm surprised to see the price still holding above the 0.736 retrace (@7250) and anything below getting bought up quite quickly. Horizontal resistance at 7600 is still very strong and get rejected on every attempt.

I've looked at our last fractal when we went to 6500 early April and though we've dropped a bit further this time, there are still some similarities in the price action, albeit being less volatile this time around, and volume still being terrible. 

https://www.tradingview.com/x/kbhJXXhl/

As a means of managing expectations here, this is still a no-trade zone for me, though I'm still holding on to a small underwater long position. Price is looking heavy, but I do personally feel that bears are losing momentum. 

https://www.tradingview.com/x/g6rWYeJ9/

The fact that a decent amount of shorts have opened whilst being unable to break 7200, nor being able to push down into/through the blue trend line signifies to me that it's pretty unlikely will see the bottom falling out through a BRD that will screw ~~everyone~~ longs over. 

Important levels for today in a bearish case would be a push through 7100 as it will become a certainty that we will test the bottom of the massive pennant we're been oscillating in since 12.8->11.7->10k 
On the bullish side, if we manage to brake 7.5 we could see some momentum upwards as about 2k shorts in Finex will be at breakeven/underwater, and will want to close to keep profits/prevent losses. 

If shorts keep rising like in our previous 6.4k situation, I'll take another long position as the r/r would be pretty good in the event this is an accumulation zone. We still have about 48 hours to oscillate in the region before we encounter the downtrend resistance from 10k (red-line in chart) at which point a direction will have to be chosen. I've set alarms at 7150 + 7450 to take a position if the action looks promising. Other than that the markets pretty boring so there's no real point to constantly monitor. 

Good luck everyone!


kinda weird that everyone expects more downside yet shorts are not increasing , afraid of getting squeezed?
so big money went OTC and now we all sitting here waiting for average joe to market buy our bags?
Poloniex just froze *all* unverified accounts. Ouch. And they said you could withdraw, but turns out they just dropped *all account limits to $0*. What the fuck
Is there any truth to the rule where the longer the cosolidation period , the stronger the impulse no matter which direction price goes? It feels like it makes sense, but I'm wondering if there's any truth to this.
I've had a verified Poloniex account for months with six figures on it and everything is suddenly frozen. About to shit myself.
You guys know 6,8 - 7,4 is bottom, right?  
layered long entries around 7240, stop 6999. gambling on the scenario that this oscillates a bit more before any clear movement, and we are currently on the bottom of that channel. so target 7500ish. not gonna pretend there's solid TA to base any decisions on in this situation.


Help me understand this. I imagine it like this:

- Price goes up
- Shorters are forced to buy Bitcoins 
- Which results in a steep rise
- They have their bags full of unwanted coins
- Sell them as fast as they can
- Price drops sharply

Am I getting this right?
What do you guys do with your trading profits?

A) Buy more BTC
B) Let it sit in USD on an Exchange
C) Buy your favorite alts
D) Cash out and send to bank account 
E) Nothing, I fucking suck at trading and I’ve lost it all 
F) Hookers, Blow, Condoms, and Mountain Dew 
There's only a bit of good news that I have and that's shorts have increased by 1k in the past 8 hours while the price has remained relatively constant. And longs have gone down during that time. Just like last time when we were ranging from 6.6 to 7.1 bears seem to be struggling to bring it down further. Although if we do go down from here I wouldn't be surprised as sentiment in here is so bearish. If everyone keeps selling like they have been we probably will see sub 6k.

Edit: Shorts continue to climb. In the hour I wrote it another 200 have been added on.

Edit 2: Holy shit. Since my last edit, in 20 minutes, shorts have climbed another 70. I'm starting to get a little more bullish. Very, very, cautiously bullish.

Edit 3: Massive long just opened up, too. A big fight seems to be happening at this price range. Especially with that wick down that was instantly bought up. Very interesting price action. Bitcoin never ceases to entertain!
https://www.tradingview.com/x/glu403Nd/

Just practicing my charting and analysis. I've purposely not used other people's charts for a reference. This is the first one I've drawn from scratch and shared, it's very simple. Any feedback welcome.  

The long term bottom trend line that originated in Sept '17 as resistance turned support seems to be what everyone is watching. The green box shows that over the next week a drop through 6870-6950 (increasing daily) could likely mean reaching a new low for 2018 if the previous two lows of ~6500 and ~6000 do not offer strong support and a meaningful bounce. This also assumes bears are able to push down through 7200, which with the way things are going seems almost to be a foregone conclusion. We'll likely know if they can any time over the next couple of days.

If there were to be a reversal from any of these points then a possible mid-term target could be the trend line originating from 20th Jan '18. The recent horizontal resistance areas of 7650, 7775 and 8050 would need to be broken first with strong buying pressure. There has been a reluctance to solidify any moves upwards since the fall from 9950 and it seems only an event such as the BGD from April 12th would restore any kind of lasting rally. Unless shorts start to pile on fuelling incentive for a cascading stop hunt, big order buyers may remain reluctant to initiate such a thing. From reading social media there does seem to be a widespread willingness to buy in from ~6900-7100, so perhaps there will be enough support in this range to keep the sellers at bay for now.

Even r/cryptocurrency is bearish 
I’m feeling bullish, but still quite bearish at heart. Going to enter a long.
Edit: 5/29/18 *1 day later, up $300.
Sorry for alt talk, but since the alt thread is dead and not much posts here atm i will post it since it may effect bitcoin price.

Did anyone notice these hidden ETH sell walls that are around since ~ 4h? You can see them pretty good on the 15min chart. First one was at 574, second one at 565, next one at 567 and the one atm at 569. Thousands and thousands of ETH were sold into these walls today.

Do you guys think it has any effect on the BTC price as soon as those walls are gone? For me it seems like massive suppression. ETH also took a larger hit than BTC in the last weeks. I just have this nasty feeling that this thing is ready to explode a little and might drag BTC with it. 

I had a good hedge short from the 7500 area, but thinking about closing it here before we get some kind of black swan event. Any opinions? Cheers.
[deleted]
Looks like we're forming a rounded\-ish bottom, like when we visited $6400\-ish and we just stayed the range for like two weeks. We've stayed the range for like four days. We could still test $7000, but every day we hold above it makes me think its less and less likely that we'll visit the $6ks soon. I'm OK with waiting another week for a breakout. 

Be patient, be careful. Best of luck trading, everyone.
Head says we’re heading towards $2500.


Heart says hold. 
Ascending triangle or bear flag?
Couple of question about trading futures:

Does the price of a futures contract mostly (or often) converge with the spot price towards time of settlement?

What’s the driver behind the premium or discount of the futures price? Is it purely market based?

Why is it more common to offer leverage on futures, compared to spot? Is it because the broker has more liquidity and arbitrage possibility because the broker is only liable to settle the asset at a later date?

Does anyone have experience with the OKEx exchange? I’m considering to start testing the waters a bit with trading futures there... I only hear negative things about Bitmex, like lots of slippage, low liquidity on some contracts etc.
Is there any way to track open volume/interest on bitmex/bitfinex over periods of time? 
**Position Bot Update**

Hi guys, i've setup a new notification system based on the **PushBullet** app.

For what i can see this one is free and so far no limitations. Will allow the creation of 1 channel per user so you can follow just the users you want and have full control.

Just PM with the command **!help notification** and follow instructions. There is also a test channel so you can try it without having to wait for a position change.

Let me know if all is working fine so i can go on with the creation of the real channels and update the instructions and subscription system.


**Position Bot Update**

Reposting this because the PM bot was offline this afternoon and had some pending requests.

Hi guys, i've setup a new notification system based on the **PushBullet** app.

For what i can see this one is free and so far no limitations. Will allow the creation of 1 channel per user so you can follow just the users you want and have full control.

Just PM with the command **!help notification** and follow instructions. There is also a test channel so you can try it without having to wait for a position change.

Let me know if all is working fine so i can go on with the creation of the real channels and update the instructions and subscription system.


What are the bears waiting for to finish  this ? Just dump it already !
Let's call this the 7k beartrap
https://blockchain.info/charts/n-transactions?timespan=2years

Bitcoin txs/day are lower than 2 years ago... That surprises me a lot 
The 'Hopium' Fractal:

https://pbs.twimg.com/media/DeJFsfuW0AEnvL9.jpg:large
Anyone else watching this sell wall for ETHUSD on Bitfinex?  Going on 6 hours now...  must be huge and I can imagine a great deal of it is hidden.

Wish I could see the trade history on there
I truly wonder why we are still going sideways in the 7k range. This hasn’t happened before. We always got out of the 7-8k range within a day or two, except for last November.

I really wonder whether we break 7k to the downside. I’m out of a position until further notice, but a nice downward wick on the daily would deff convince me to go long. If we drop to 7k and then bounce back to 7200-7300, I can only imagine the bottom is in.

I still think 5900 was the bottom, and will continue to think so until 6800 falls with conviction or we touch below 6400
[deleted]
Polo is now reducing withdraw limits to zero, basically confiscating your funds unless you verify and give them your ssn. This just seems like a dick move, anyone know of a way to just withdraw everything and shut down the account instead? 
Mods should be more stringent with banning covert shills, especially the BCash variety.

Good lord, I did not know how good we had it when ETHtraders were the ones brigading this sub. Those guys are saints compared with these people, who just constantly push false narratives and leech off of the branding. 

How many times do they need to *repeat the same thing*? Yes, we all understand that BCash is "Satoshi's Vision" and that Roger is actually a good guy and Greg is Satan worshiper. Holy shit, we get it. Bigger blocks are gifts from God himself and it is sanctimony to separate the witness data from the block. Yes, we understand that Bitcoin is completely unusable, controlled by the Bilderberg Group and has no future. Furthermore, we understand that all the innovation in the entire space has moved over to BCash. We understand that raising the block limit by arbitrary amounts is revolutionary innovation. We all understand this at this point. 

It's just enough already. This is so obviously a form of covert shilling and yet it seems to go unchecked for the most part by mods. This only happens with BCash shilling because they can twist words and meanings in order to make themselves sound, on the surface, as if they are arguing a fair point regarding use of the term "Bitcoin". But their points don't hold up to scrutiny and it's endlessly annoying to have to keep pointing out how their narrative is false. I wish the mods would just step up to the plate and ban these people. This is a sub for *Bitcoin* discussion and BCash is an alt, not Bitcoin, so its discussion should be relegated to the Daily Alt thread.

edit: So I gather that people actually *like* the shilling? Okay...
The only good news in this dump is bch is less than $1000! LOL
Ahh I feel it. The setup for a nice glorius BART 
The stop loss hunting doesn't seem to have the same effect on the price anymore.

Maybe the bears are running out of steam?
Here are my targets for the next few weeks. https://www.tradingview.com/x/B92uIN7L/
I'm not seeing a single bull in this thread 
When/if the break under the 5.8k low happens can you imagine the bloodbath and panic?

I'm of the opinion it will happen... Eventually. Just there are so many people who are pretty convinced it'll hold again. Can't imagine how they'll react if it breaks down.


The longer we consolidate in this range, the more bearish my already bearish sentiment gets. I think the most **bullish** move the market could make right now is to **drop** down to 6950 with a significant bounce that breaks the decending channel: https://www.tradingview.com/x/yrEuNrBC/

But considering we've consolidated around 7.2k so many times I'm not sure that'll happen.

Edit1: Added a chart

Edit2: Personally I don't think it's worth shorting this until 6.9 breaks down with confidence. There is a small chance there'll be a very strong bounce there. And if 6.9k breaks down there's going to be plenty of opportunities to short the corn down to goblin town.
How spoofy flips positions https://www.tradingview.com/x/HTFK65NR/
Will the ongoing dump of ETHBTC have an effect on BTCUSD?

Usually the prices are coupled...
I feel like everyone and their grandmother has buys from 7150 - 6900 but the price just cant get there.
I'm curious, does anyone know why this subreddit has such a bullish bias?  While there are some people that give bearish commentary (and there has been an uptick in the past several days with the drops btc has been making) it seems like they are often downvoted or otherwise harassed.  I've found some well thought out posts here that have influenced my trading decisions but I've also seen a lot of posts on the bullish side of things that are fueled purely by hopium and ignoring all of the warning bell indicators going off.

Anyway, good luck trading to everyone this weekend.  Last week was an absolutely amazing week for me, I increased my stack by over 3x in the past 4 days or so and part of that success is due to some of the insights I've gleaned from people posting here (not lambo money more like honda money, but was still a very meaningful amount for me).
I doubt that BTC would be this low if it weren't for all of the recent regulatory news. The low volume could be attributed to Bitfinex requiring tax information from certain high volume accounts. The whales could be "spooked" by the prospect of having their respective governments auditing them. On top of this, it appears that the US government is going to start exercising their regulatory authority both domestically and internationally. I expect we're going to see sanctions, subpoenas, and perhaps even arrests for various violations of securities and trading laws. We're in for a wild ride this year.

And one last thing, if anyone PMs you on Reddit with an invite to a pump and dump group, ignore it and stay away from it. Wilfully participating in a pump and dump group is a form of securities fraud and can get you heavy fines and in some cases jail time.

https://www.sec.gov/fast-answers/answerspumpdumphtm.html
[removed]
Any opinions on wether the 4H hidden bear div or the developing 4H bull div is stronger or of more significance (if it confirms)?
Anybody have an accurate read on the 50W MA?  Is it at 7.6?

I think we are set to close the week in 1.5 hours.  I've read closing below the 50 is bearish, but I am starting to see some folks on trading view saying the bottom is in.  Good times.
So since the week is closing now what do you think how it will continue? Looking at the charts I could imagine we are going up again (at least to 7.6k)
Just discovered this trend line, and it's making me so horny.

https://www.tradingview.com/x/IpWTES1S/
Jeez, what happen to you guys!?

- scale in with logarithmic entries from 6,8 - 7,4
- HODL
- profit
[deleted]
So I am not much of a formation follower, but looking at this we have 1 BRD down to go and then the last months move is totally gone https://imgur.com/a/kI1RmpX

Is this some kind of multi H&S pattern maybe ?
bear flag or bart on the hourly?
https://www.turtlebc.com/tools/buy_percentage

Anyone got any thoughts on this? Seen it thrown around on twitter a bit today. I'm not really sure what it's supposed to portray and the whole site looks like another of those signals services for lazy people. 
So i notice this, and suddenly spoofy pays us a visit? interesting :) https://www.tradingview.com/x/xQym3ets/
Bought the "dip" at $7330 (too early), watched it dip further, and sold with a small ~1% loss in the early hours (after an unnecessary, long night watch). Should have used tighter stops.

Edit: Sorry, I will add some of my analysis. Several people mentioned that the RSI indicated oversold conditions on several time frames last night. [We were nearing the end of a formation that looked like a triangle, or a wedge.](https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8m7np4/daily_discussion_saturday_may_26_2018/dzmi38y/) BTC made a last attempt to break up; that failed. Then it broke down from the formation. I estimated the dip would be longer than the previous ones as it was a break from formation. $7330 seemed OK as long entry, but there was no rebound for many hours and I didn't want to go to sleep with an open trade, so I closed it with about 1% loss.
there's a bit of bullish divergence, and although it seem like we can head lower i'll still stick to my [plan](https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8m7np4/daily_discussion_saturday_may_26_2018/dzlqwet/);

long from 7260; stops at 7200
Slow, painful rectification is in the cards for those on the short side.  Shorting on a small scale for a quick scalp with a small part of your stack is kind of fun.  Shorting on a large scale is a recipe for disaster because the cover will always bring it up higher than the dump brought it down.  You can only increase the float temporarily, and then it tightens up when you run out of coins, just when you were hoping for panic dumping to save you.

Oh well. Live and learn, big bears, and thanks for the money (again)! 
Should I go long or short?
What are some good Poloniex alternatives for trading small amounts of [coin]/btc pairs? I'm looking for a platform where you can trade something like 0.001 btc worth of any alt, be it exchange or margin. I'm not too happy with their "You gotta place an order of 0.02btc  minimum if you wanna use margin"... It's bullshit, and I'm tired of exploiting a glitch in order to trade 0.001 at a time.

Edit: in case anyone is wondering about the glitch, the thing is that they allow you to place orders of 0.0001btc minimum, if you're *reducing* your position. You can place a small order to flip your positions. So, if you margin sell a value of 0.02btc in [insert alt here], then margin buy with a 0.021btc order, you're margin long 0.001btc. But doing that is risky when your margin balance is 0.014 btc. But once done, I can "close" the position with a 0.00099 btc order, and flip into a 0.001btc short by placing an order worth 0.00101
Hi guys, 

Other than Poloniex, what exchanges can you lend out your Bitcoin to margin traders on?
[deleted]
[removed]
Hey guys, just posting two different perspectives of orderbook in 60 seconds time frame. :)

[Orderbook 1](http://anon.pics/view/image/orderbooks-1)
[Orderbook 2](http://anon.pics/view/image/orderbooks-2)
Little mini head and shoulder on 5 min. Looks like an easy quick scalp back down to 7290.
price action recently has been unhinged, Barts so many fakeouts, etc
Catastrophic stops and babysitting seems to be the way to go. Makes this less fun. 
I know what you mean and I would rather lose a little on my current short position and see the market solidly recover for awhile than continue to make small profits shorting.  A weaker and weaker market will just lead to less volatility and less traders and will eventually be party over, for the most part.
Feel the same. I might become the meme “ I’ll buy the shit out of anything below $7k” then when $7k hits I get stage fright. 
Patience brings the sweetest fruit.
I am thinking longer term, which is why I am short here and just hope I don't get shaken out by another DCB.  But a relief rally could come at any time and you are probably right a bounce would save you even if we visited $6500 first.



I'm not sure if that's the wisest move. Let's say you're on 1x. That means you'll be liquidated at around $3700. Are we absolutely, positively going to stay above $3700? I'd say there's a good chance the price goes below that at some point this year.

We're also about to close the week under the 50 period MA for the first time in 3 years. There may be a bounce at some point to retest this average but it's hard to see why that won't remain strong resistance for the foreseeable future. If the weekly closes in this range, I'd suspect a dump will ensue soon after. A better place to long would be $7100 or $6800 and exit on the bounce. I don't think there's a whole lot of upside at this point though, although there's still a chance the price bounces hard off of either of these zones. Below $6800 and you should really think about closing your long, imo.
God that’s bearish. That’s one of my sell signals right there. The second sell signal is a clear break underneath the support line (the one connecting the 5900 wick with the 6400 bottom). If we break the line then I’m selling and I’ll come back to the market at a later date, hopefully as close to the bottom as I can get.
Good analysis regarding the MA, and 7.1 would be a great entry for a long. I'm up a bit on my long from 7.28 and would definitely add at 7.1. Looking for a big gain. It seems likely to happen. I'll let it ride for a week.
I'm not. Long since 7450 on Thursday.

People talking about capitulation, 50ma crossing and all that stuff gives me a warm feeling.

I'm fine taking the risk and have stops in place if BTC enters 'moron mode' because TA is as good as throwing dust in the wind rn. \(imho\).

Edit \- still mining as a hedge as well, gpus are hella cheap.
There are two possible bull scenarios to look at imo, one being the potential series of (marginally) higher lows for Bitcoin (~6k, ~6.5k, ~7k, there's all these triangle-ish formations being thrown around to emphasize it, too), then there's a very well formed (and well-backed by fundamental developments in the space, imo) IHS reversal shaping up on the total market cap. That second one could throw a wrench into the plans of bears as it likely wouldn't be invalidated with a break below $7k on BTC and eventually move upwards with a reversal somewhere in the 6-6.5k region depending on how hard alts dump if Bitcoin does go there. 

That said, this is a very awkward place to buy / go long. Makes much more sense to wait and see whether you get to buy cheaper, or have at least some confirmation of the downtrend reversal before jumping in -- which is probably why any kind of bounces are so weak and short-lived. 
This is what I'm looking at: https://i.imgur.com/ddfJD3o.png
Maybe we bounce, but everyone is itching to press the sell button. Not very many bulls to trap at this point. There was 3 years worth of buying since our last real bear market, and a lot of our downward movement lately has been organic selling.

If compared to 2014, very unlikely to see any significant rallies at this point which don't lead to a continued bearish market structure. Just a slow bleed. Its cliche to compare today to 2014 at this point, but its literally the only chart in the world that makes sense for a comparison.
I am not. Still hoping we will find our bottom in this range. If shit hits the floor, I will walk away with the losses.

I am long since almost a week ago from $8,275 45% stack, added another 19% at $7,538 yesterday. 

I have another 34% left which I might add if we go lower. Will not add it and close my position if we go lower than $6,900.
[Better chart](https://www.tradingview.com/x/Ynk1jMC5/)


Yeah that's extremely scary. 



Edit: Fuck it. I'm gonna go sell all my crypto now. I'm officially out.
Does this happen every bear market? Or is this the only instance of this happening. Is everyone going to be making bets on something that has only ever occurred one time? It's not much of a sample size....
Non rhetorical question: Do y'all think "everyone" is now watching the weekly close and 50ma? If everyone is, it is more likely to be used to get retail guys to sell/short or do whatever the MM's want. 
I expect to be above it before it closes in 17hours, but yeah it's scary.
I thought you went out yesterday?
Yes, read up on Wyckoff and his theories and methods and so on, they are very well tested. Also check up Anna Coullings Volume Price Analysis, one of the most useful books I ever read regards to charting, candles and volume. :\)
longs underwater sell into the slightest bounce
can you explain what happened more for a newb like me? on the chart i see a temporary price spike, followed by a more severe drop

[https://i.imgur.com/FKEQ09Z.png](https://i.imgur.com/FKEQ09Z.png)
Which is highway robbery. Maybe some regulations would be in order.
An inverted JesusCross_candle?
[deleted]
Yes that’s why the bear market will continue until every delusional bull is liquidated.
[deleted]
He’s been right on the Eth dump thus far 
I would imagine if the 'bearish' target wasn't so ridiculous, the votes would be pretty different. It's pretty hard to justify a sub $2000 BTC target given the data available right now, both TA and fundamentals-wise. Yes, it's not an 'impossible' target -- some crazy regulations or some major exchange hacks with subsequent coin dumps or whatever could possibly lead to it. But the kind of black swans it'd take to reach those price targets aren't something to actually base a serious prediction on. It's no different from going all in long because, 'what if there's a green dildo up to 20k tomorrow'. Yeah sure maybe it could happen, but it's not bloody likely from the current position.  
I don't doubt at all that the majority are still bullish...it will take several more months to break their spirits.  
Honestly? I reckon more sideways.
Could say the same about 60 day EMA on 1W chart, its just about to bounce off of it \(or not\), hasnt dropped below yet. Last time it was below; 2015.
I don’t think we will see the same outcome than 2014. This market has changed significantly since.
365 days really weighs the past data much more important than the present IMHO.  
Username ch... doesn't really make sense.
Keep that short open. There is no reason on earth for an upshot.
someone is going to be very pissed when they come back to their bot lmao
There are a ton of small limit orders too.  You'd think the GDAX system would get pissed.  I seem to remember something about anti-wash trading detection on their API.
Is it like a DDoS attack on GDAX...?
the .001 buys were ultra common on gdax during the summer & fall last year, don't ask me entirely why though.
Very sad. I remember the days when they had 100,000 BTC volume on a single pair... I think killing the Trollbox killed Polo.
Do you think their fee structure is the main problem?
Agree volume faded but overall volume decreased across all exchanges.  Also, because of their strong KYC, less sketchy traders = less manipulation = less volume.
They don't deserve a single btc of volume until they provide support
Its pretty sad. A shame really. I bet many people here have used Polo especially a few years ago. 
I've always heard negative things about Poloniex so I never would have guessed that *they* used to drive the market. Then again I've only been here about 5 and a half months.
Yep. Wanted to move stops into profit but i think i just have to trust its going down... 
https://status.kraken.com/incidents/9jpfq60vdz5p

They’re working on resolving it and seems like they’re back up now.
"organic volume dragon" lol
Moonboiiii. Drugged by hopium. See volume across aĺl the exchanges. Then see google trend. Your chart is bias due to super low volume and hopium
Yes, massive dump to 6k or lower.
how many days is "next days"?

edit: agree with below.  massive dump to 6k or lower.
> it's nearly impossible

it's *actually* impossible. If you want the best fee, you need volume of 100 million ~ 13333 BTC, GDAX/EUR daily volume 600 BTC * 30 Days = 18000 BTC

So as a market maker to get 0.1% fees you need to have 74% of all volume, which is just plain silly.

Also the small fish will never get in the 0.2% class.

More people are leaving => less liquidity => more people are leaving.

It's just coinbase screwing up as always. 


they have a captive audience
This has been for a couple of months already though. 
Limit orders still free? 
I share this sentiment. I'm looking for a bounce around 7 and a move up to potentially a lower high around 9.1 within the large triangle formation we're all looking at. Arrive around 9.1 in July and by August we'll have a clearer indication whether the market breaks down or up. My bet is up.
They're gonna open in 5 minutes after bitmex funding hits ;)
the sentiment here is a bit  different than elsewhere. The reason it's bearish here is cause people are smarter :p

Go to r/bitcoin, r/ethtrader and r/cryptocurrency and you can see that the average investor is incredibly bullish still. they all believe this is surely the bottom 
The amount of shorts stayed pretty stable the entire move down. 
Personally, it would really surprise me if we went sub 7k and I'm fairly bearish right now with a long from 7450.
OTC isn't an infinite pool
Do you really think big money would hodl like idiots?
Ah, the good old "bag holder" talking point. Lol. I'll take those bags off your hands. But I must warn you that you're selling them to me cheap and will deeply regret doing so in a couple years, if that.
Or ourselves. The price of an asset can rise (or fall) with a constant number of people. We don't need new money to come in to go up. Just consistent buying.
Big money is shorting the corn
Usually it would make sense to do say 80% OTC and then 20% on a public market to help boost the price of your stack.

Or adjusted depending on the amount. 

This only applies to very large amounts though really. 
And there I was thinking Circle might not make any profit off their Poloniex purchase. Looks like they found a way to make money off of it, after all!!!
Big surprise, they did exactly what they said they would in December:

https://poloniex.com/press-releases/2017.12.27-Notice-to-legacy-account-holders/

You had 6 months of withdrawing 2k a day if you bothered paying attention.
My daily withdrawal limit is still $25,000!?
Happy I left both them and bittrex several years ago, they are living only on old merits. Polo and the whole eth classic drama was the final drop for me 
Seems like even verified level 3 accounts are frozen. Sketchy. 
You have a source for that?
Bittrex did the same thing, with no warning.  They let you deposit funds but could not withdraw unless verified.  It's just a way to steal money and it is effective.
I think there's some truth to it, especially in crypto.  A lot of people trade purely off the volatility, and crypto is well known for having massive price swings.  I can imagine some traders getting overly anxious after price action stagnates, then jumping on any sign of a breakout.
I certainly agree with you that impulse will be stronger given the circumstances. 

There is a whole lot of human nature and psychology behind it.
I don't know, but the volume doesn't go to 0 and once back will push hard in whatever the direction is.
>  Poloniex account for months with six figures on it and everything is suddenly frozen.

poloniex has been freezing withdrawals and accounts for quite some time. It just seems too shady and unsafe to even put funds there imo.

But does they respond to your ticket or just ignoring you? others have had issues not getting a reply from their customer support
I doubt Circle acquired an exchange to immediately scam users. You say you're verified so at worst you'll probably have to undergo a hassle of a process to try and get it unlocked, make a lot of noise on social media, etc. to get it unlocked, but I wouldn't worry about it being gone. 

Seems like a few people are having this issue, so maybe they'll give it a higher priority? Best of luck anyways. 
Moonboi is herreee! Giff me some hopium please
Dream on binarynachos...
you are basically going for a 1:1 r:r play which is always bad
I'm kind of in the same place.  I am long at 7260 with a target in the mid 7400s/7500s where I will then be returning short before the cannonball jump downward.
No, if you’re shorting you are borrowing bitcoin to sell and buy back lower, if they’re forced to buy back the bitcoin, it’s to repay the loan.  They aren’t holding any bags.
Shorts never had bitcoin. They borrow it to sell it and then have to buy it back to cover. If they buy back lower that's their profit. To sell again they have to borrow again. A pure short player never actually holds any Bitcoin, except maybe their profits if trading in BTC based futures till they convert them to their currency of choice. 
Didn't this whole pump from 6k-10k start with a massive 60 million dollar short closing on bitmex? 
No. When you close a short you give back the borrowed coins so you have nothing left in your bag (except your coins if you use them as collateral)
Maybe.  I imagine it like this.

Whale wants to short.    
Buys 400 BTC, lets the book fill in for 60 seconds, hunting stops, etc.  
Takes a margin short position, leveraging as much out of of the order book as possible.  
Umm, I don't think so.
g) lose profits, remake profits, lose them again, be stuck in endless equilibrium   

Depending on the amount, i buy the corresponding lambo autopart.
if I get to a certain nominal amount I'll cash out a portion and keep trading. but for now I just feel kinda good about it, wish I would've done this and that better, and treat it like a game I'm getting better at

I pretty much consider most of the money gone, especially since it was almost entirely liquidated at one point, so I don't really see it as real money yet. Which is probably good for a better trading mindset but one day I'll need to realize that it's real money
I'm not a trader. I HODL. Accumulate!
E
I'll let you know when I make some. 
Definitely E, but ideally all of the above.
Measure your wealth in Bitcoin 
Can I like this 10x 

I’m halfway between D and E and F if I was single. 
F) but no condoms
D) I cash out if I achieve enough of my target in the beginning of the month, at other times A) and sometimes B).
D: YieldCos, senior living REITs, Silver ETNs, etc. Playing broader trends in commodity valuations, gold:silver ratio, demographic shifts, energy sector changes, emerging or frontier markets, the marijuana industry, etc.  


If BTC really consolidates and tightens around $4,000 for a couple years, or something crazy like that, then I'll likely perform another major asset shift to ride the next bull run, but some of these high\-yielding sectors and the silver chart have just looked much sexier than BTC to me over the last several months.
Cashing out a little bit, but mainly accumulating more Bitcoins which is the objective #1
E
Overall I'll say G) proposed by nor3g (win some, lose some) but sometimes I'll do D) or else just B).
G) Fund terrorism. Bitcoin's true purpose
Traders should use guns in a open outcry pit!
>  From reading social media there does seem to be a widespread willingness to buy in from ~6900-7100

Ummm....that is not where you want to get your data and conclusions from.  Don't overthink it.  The chart tells all, absent of bad news that comes out.
I made the same "prediction" but using LTC's chart. I'm an absolute noob, though, so I have no idea what's really going to happen. From the chart you'd expect it to drop slightly then oscillate again.

But when the two lines converge, I believe the poles of the Earth will shift, Atlantis will rise from the sea, and either we'll take their ancient rocketships to the moon or they'll deem us unworthy and flood the earth.
well considering /r/cryptocurrency is mostly teenagers and college students investing like $200, I don't know if I really care about their opinions.
Why would you open a long here? The price has just been slapped back down from 7450 on comparatively higher volume. Surely you’d wait to re-test 7300 to get a better entry?
Was the same around 720 and it didn't turn well as buyers eventually lose faith and give up. I don't understand closing your short, in case of blackswan we dump? 

Ps same kind of tactics but as buy wall was used to support eos at 6$ while btc dumped hard. They sold at 18.6. not convinced it's block.one at all.

https://www.tradingview.com/x/jkYC6Zvz
ETH is not being surpressed, it's going to drop. ETH didn't take as much as a beating as BTC. If ETH would be as low as BTC right now it would be at 450 instead of 550. 
One more theory : it's wash trading to make you think there is insane buying pressure and lure you into buying it. Because around 720, as soon as one of the wall was eaten, buying magically disapeared. And don't tell me all of ethrader is frantically buying millions of $ of eth as a revenge on eos, nor that the bots are that dumb. That being said, the effect is the same and eth is poised to go down.
ETH just overbook BTC in top volume on BFX to. if this selling get's eaten up it might turn out good.
It's EOS dumping ETH they raised 
frankly to me it seems like noone knows whats going on, and everyone is looking for a pattern to justify their trades

for now everyone decided that its ETH leading this thing and any move in ETH has to be reflected in BTC. Which will last until another pattern is emerged. 

Frankly I think its bullshit, since we now know the marketwide sell off was due to the BFX investigation which insiders obviously knew about 

On the flip side, I would take a look at the ETH/BTC ratio on the daily chart. ETH is up by about 50% from April, and has barely dropped from when BTC was pushing 10k. Given that these walls are hidden, and they have apparently sold thousands of ETH today, what makes you think these traders aren't trying to cash in on their profits from buying in April before it drops back down?
Damn how big is your screen?
I'm going to sleep. I'm half expecting to wake up to $6000. I'm tempted to stay awake all night watching the charts... But nah. Can't sacrifice health in order to keep an eye on the market. 
Balance the heart and the head and you'll sleep better.  Every time I find the two are out of balance... I rebalance, and the problem goes away.  Sleep like a baby.
Richard Heart? ;\)
Follow your heart, it’s the only compass you need 
On today's episode of Stop Hunters...
A bart 
Irrelevant shape you've assigned meaning to or irrelevant shape you've assigned meaning to?
(1) Yes, it tends to converge to spot as we get closer.  Those June end contracts will get closer to the spot price as we near expiry date. September can vary a lot till august.  In derivative terminology they refer to this as theta.

(2) A few things matter here. Yes, market orders can move them because they're slow to adjust due to low liquidity. But the biggest factors are recent price movement + funding rate.  The higher the funding rate the more incentive longs have to move towards far dated contracts.  In derivative terms this is like the vega.

(3)  In general, not just crypto, futures tend to be cash settled, whereas spot tends to be settled in the good itself.  Not due to broker wanting arbitrage.  Futures was intended as a way to hedge for both buyers and sellers (you will have corn to *sell* at harvest in September and want to lock in price today. Me, an ethanol producer want to lock in my cost of *buying* corn in September so I can plan my production around it -- this combination created a futures market).  Then people realized speculation is helpful for markets having price discovery, so it took on a life of its own.

(4) sorry, no experience with okex.  But my understanding is that bitmex has better liquidity and service than okex.  Good luck :)
I heard rumours/news about the OKEX CEO quitting last week, and they had some withdrawal problems 

I think Bitmex is much better for futures trading since that's is their only focus and not a lot of tokens and so on
https://www.bitmex.com/app/fundingHistory

If i recalll bitmex also included ticker for (external) btc interest rates somewhere; no historic data for open volume, though

https://www.bfxdata.com/swaphistory/btc

you can use tradingview BFX:BTCUSDLONGS or something to see how much volume was open. 
You can only sign up to PushBullet with Google or Facebook? I’d like to keep my trading related activities away from those accounts of mine.

Think I’m gonna try to set something up with the RSS feeds after all.
The test channel worked fine for me. Haven't had any notifications about my subscribed traders but as far as I can tell they've not entered any positions today. 
I can’t find individual traders channels. Where do I even search for them? Only reason I found the position_bot channel was because I typed in the URL directly.
Bears have literally nothing else to do than sell high and be patient as the trend is down. In a bullrun bulls have nothing else to do than wait for the dip as the trend is up. Incredible people still think bear whales are pushing hard every 100$ further down just for entertainment.
Why dump it when you can cause maximum pain by hunting stops / liquidation prices?

Ultimate wreckage (and maximum profit for whales) to be had by pushing it right up, only to drop it right down again, and repeat.
Look at the 6h chart it needs a couple more candles before a dump so they get tight so they can expand after

It's looking good. Going flat over a period of time especially under attack usually precedes a big run up. I still say somebody needs to cover a lot of borrowed coins. That should create quite a big pop,, much bigger than the little dip over the past month.
you should be looking at total out points, not transactions. Most exchanges put dozens of outpoints in a single transaction
Most txs are trading related. Besides exchange tx batching, there are less trades in a bear market. 
Almost 40 percent of transactions are batched now. Segwit works. Also something like 4000 LN nodes now. A lot more value is being transacted now. 
2 years ago 1 bitcoin was worth quite a bit less than it is now

so bitcoin volume might be down, by dollar value is way up

* 2016 - Bitcoin was at ~$600 so 234,000 BTC volume = ~141mm 
* 2018 - Bitcoin is at $7,300 so even the lowest # of 158,000 = $1.15 billion. So almost 9x growth in daily transactions. 
inb4 "but batching and lightning, and Hodling"
Not me.  The vast majority of bitcoin use is on exchanges.  It’s a trader’s game.  The stakes have gotten so huge anyone with a decent amount of bitcoin in a wallet had to start making serious financial decisions and most got that shit on an exchange so they could cash out at least some.  
Because crypto is more of lets create a problem we can solve vs lets find solutions to a problem. In other words, crypto is similar to the biotech drug company with a hot new drug but no patients to treat with it.
After the mempool drama the applications that need certain transactions moved to other chains. Also LN uptake has been very slow. It is more like alpha than a production ready platform.
Why would that surprise you?  Core failed to raise the block size and people moved to other coins.  This was an obvious outcome that's been discussed endlessly for four years and now it's playing out as expected.  Not only is this expected, it's shocking that it didn't happen sooner.  Core literally told people to take their business and applications to other chains.  Well guess what's happening?
Right, similar situations. I've been thinking at this today. Wishing it won't happen again.
Casually leaving the first drop out in this cycle to fit the narrative
Just bc it contains the word fractal, don't mean shit.
It's been here a lot longer than 6 hours, and there were a few more of them. All in all, more than 50k ETH was sold by those walls since yesterday. 
https://www.bfxdata.com/orderbooks/ethusd

It Finally busted through the sell wall.

Edit: looks like the sell wall was just moved up to 574.
The price likes to do what has never happened before, especially when mostly traders are involved in the price action.

They know what has happened before and want to be "smarter" than the market. But when everybody wants to be smarter, the market will behave differently as a whole.
[deleted]
My fuzzy logic on this is that below 8k and miners get tetchy but also, 6k, 6.5k, now 7k. I can see 9k being the top of the next leg up before coming back to 7.5

Meh, but that's what I think. Also another reason for not falling below 7k so far is maybe we've dropped almost 3k from the last attempt at 10k. Isn't that enough before we head up again if only to a lower high.
How did you come up with 6400 and 6800?
Imo market makers got spooked away by the investigations, but not before cashing out one last time. The market now has to heal and move on. 
Highly doubtful at this point that 5900 was the bottom. Nothing technical or fundamental even remotely signals that. Tx are dropping like crazy, volume is dwindling, media doesn't even mention crypto unless it involves a scam. There is still a huge amount of people that poured their life savings into crypto thinking they would get rich quick. Those people are literally holding on for dear life now hoping just to get back to even. If they haven't already sold, they will eventually hit their breaking point. I think BTC will close the year below 1,000. 
In my opinion, the market will start to appreciate coins with real world use cases. Pie in the sky projects will most probably decline in value. Vaporware \(80&#37; of all projects?\) will be wiped out.

Examples for grounded projects are BNB \(they recently netted more return than Deutsche Bank!\), other exchanges such as Huobi or enterprise solutions such as Vechain \(the coin with the most conceivable use cases and plenty of partnerships\). What are your favorite coins with real life value?
> I've changed my strategy of holding until I turn a profit.

That was really your strategy?  Of course that is something you would want to change.
Hate to say it but there have been about 5 months to warn you about this... I got everything off Poloniex back in January when they announced verification for users. 
You have 14 days to withdraw before verification is required, so as long as you do it before then it’s Ok.


This verification is nothing new, I just logged in and after 10 minutes of sending files got this: 

 Verification status:  VERIFIED
Withdrawal limit: $25,000 USD equivalent per day

Beyond smooth, I have been with polo since they opened, so lets post real stuff shall we.

Bittrex did this to me a few months ago and my fund are still locked up in there, and I guess will be forever.  And that same day, they let me deposit funds in there without asking for any identification.  Yes, it is outright theft.
  
The writing has been on the wall for a while now 
It's rather confusing.

On one hand, we have a public entity, Circle, stepping up and buying Poloniex, and making USDC. A massive public vote of confidence. They have people doing interviews, talks, and it's a big, public affair. Ripping off all these people would be a huge blemish on Circle.

On the other hand... Poloniex promised that the limitation would *not* hinder withdrawals (we were all aware that trading/lending/orders would be disabled, but the $2,500 limit would be intact, as Poloniex said). However, Poloniex lied and brought the limit down to $0 regardless. Shady.

I have no idea what to think.
looks like its only if you haven't verified before 
I hadn't noticed much shilling lately.
>edit: So I gather that people actually like the shilling? Okay...

Don't read too much from the karma. Someone runs bots that downvote everything that goes against the b cash narrative.

But yeah I miss the times when it was the ethtrader shills doing the raiding. Saints indeed.
They're so desperate for users 32mb and nobody could care less 
Report, DM if it's not enough. Everyone gets the same treatment. Warning; several limited ban warnings; perma-ban. The volume is too much for anyone to keep up with. Mods depend on redditors to flag rule violations.
Sounds like you are scared and think BCH is an actual threat to your investments, whilst you feel ETH is just a different product.

You then form some ideas as to why you "really" hate BCH so much. 

There is a free market, over time we will see what happens, right now the prices are based on predictions of future deliveries and growth. Let the best products win.
it was over 4000$ at one point lol.  I remember thinking, who the hell is buying at 4000$.


Keep an open mind and reap the rewards.
Some brave soul is defending the hell out of the bottom of the 15/30m bbands.
down to 6600 right?
Out of steam for what? Do they have to constantly push down or the price will make a u-turn and naturally go to 100k because it's in its nature to always go up?
lol more like volume is absolutely pathetic and no one wants to buy or sell at these levels. the only thing maintaining the price right now is the natural downward pressure due to the block subsidies being negated by pathetic buying pressure. 
we've stayed here for about 4 days almost now. we were at $9900 for like what 12 hours?
I don't think it's that the bears are running out of steam. Rather, I think it's that people are starting to get wise to the hunts.
Because...higher highs fit this pattern
Here
Short to medium term I have no idea what will happen, but on the long term I'm bullish. That's why I'm merely a lurker here, I like to read what you guys think. I don't downvote bears btw.
Here: 🐂
there wasn't a single bear in most 2017 daily threads either :P
Here
here

pretty sure we paint a higher low on the daily in comparison to feb and april
Pucker up
That's capitulation, and in my opinion it's what we need before we can start growing again
Panic will start as soon as 6.7 gives up and could take us further than 5.8 imo
If there's a sharp dip down to 5.8K, the only surefire thing to do is buy and take that bounce.  There's no way we hit a 6 month\+ low without a sharp bounce back.  It would be free money.
That's what I feel. The longer it consolidate, harder the break down. Similar to what happened yesterday.
Do you need to make a new top level comment for every idea you want to post? Can't you just consolidate in *one* comment and add edits?
The ratio can bleed out, but it always puts some down pressure on BTC when ETH drops
My dog's getting grumpy too. Not my problem. 
Same thing was said at the thelow 9’s then low 8’s......
This sideways trend can continue for months..
You have to remember that a lot of people here have been in this market for a very long time and have seen it go up enormously during that time. They are often overinvested because its given them so good returns so far or overinvested because they think it will change their life if it goes on another huge bullrun. 

There are also a significant amount of people who are under the impression that saying/spreading bullish news will make the market bullish so they go around trying to spread bullish news to effect the sentiment not realizing nobody reading it will impact the market based on their post.  

Basically even the people here shorting often have decent amounts they are holding on the side in cold storage and are long term bulls but short time bears. People appear to have a natural bias for their position because they want to defend and justify it. 

Posts that focus on analysis and present targets that aren't pants over head ridiculous and with properly outlined reasoning rarely get downvoted. It's useless drivel like, 'we goin to 1k, just look at the charts its obvious' or 'been shortin x100 from the top thx for free moneys moonboys' that does. And we've had far more of the latter than the former recently. 
Really? I see only bears in here almost
Because even bears require bitcoin for margin to bet against it.
So they're still getting paid in bitcoin even when they 'win'.  This whole space is basically bitcoin bulls and bitcoin less-bullish.


'Breathing' soon to be a violation of LAW.
> if anyone PMs you on Reddit with an invite to a pump and dump group, ignore it and stay away from it. 

You should narc on them first.

https://www.sec.gov/whistleblower/submit-a-tip
[removed]
hidden over regular because trend continuation is more likely 
well the 4h hidden bear div already played out with the drop to 7200 no?
it's 7.6 for me..?

https://www.tradingview.com/x/vYOHsgmY/
I read on a news article that it was $7,611.
Hopium should be a controlled substance.
Good chance it retests a region close to the 50 week MA sometime this week before more downside. The MA will be a bit higher once the week closes. Probably somewhere in the 7700's. I don't think it'll make it all the way there though.
maybe someone will push it to $7.6 before the week closes lol
Of course you could imagine that, but the reality will likely be quite different.
What will happen is the dumping will continue until everyone is liquidated.
horny for shorting? because there's lower highs off that line several times...honestly when you put it that way it looks like a massive blow off top that's taking forever to settle down 
It's a trading sub and this is a bear market?
weekly candle looks ugly. Jesus save us.
I've got a feeling my wife frequents this place because she's been a bit off with me ever since I opened an underwater long. 
The Bitcoin market is currently male dominated. But that doesn't mean the gap won't lessen in the next few years. [https://www.ft.com/content/259734ca\-0b95\-11e8\-839d\-41ca06376bf2](https://www.ft.com/content/259734ca-0b95-11e8-839d-41ca06376bf2) As this article states, *as cryptocurrencies become more mainstream, they are attracting more diverse investors: more women, more people of colour and more leftwingers.* [*https://www.bloomberg.com/news/articles/2018\-01\-24/a\-look\-at\-who\-owns\-bitcoin\-young\-men\-and\-why\-lack\-of\-trust*](https://www.bloomberg.com/news/articles/2018-01-24/a-look-at-who-owns-bitcoin-young-men-and-why-lack-of-trust) According to this recent survey, 71&#37; of bitcoin investors are male. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
[removed]
just standard consolidation triangles:

https://imgur.com/a/KKfONw4


It looks like a bearflag with a couple of fakeouts or a broadening bottom
At the bottom, this page used to show the BTC-alt markets that were considered "buy markets".  Essentially this graph is an aggregate on all of the open orders on major exchanges for different alt pairings, and can be used as a gauge of market sentiment (not market activity, as filled orders aren't reflected here).  Right now there is very little buy pressure in the alt market.  Going back, you can see that the spikes in Buy Percentage often coincide with price increases, and vice versa.
> signals services for lazy people

Take it back!
How is the Buy Pourcentage indicator similar to a Buy / Sell depth sum ratio ?
That amount of movement is basically just noise. Are you saying you should have used a stop tighter than even 1%? If that's all you can tolerate, then this might not be the right market for you to be investing in. 
[deleted]
> Shorting on a large scale is a recipe for disaster because the cover will always bring it up higher than the dump brought it down.

Why is this the case?

>You can only increase the float temporarily, and then it tightens up when you run out of coins, just when you were hoping for panic dumping to save you.

The float is dynamic in both directions, not just as it relates to supply tightening, but also expanding. Why would you assume it's going to contract over longer time frames (months to a year)?
[deleted]
> Shorting on a large scale is a recipe for disaster because the cover will always bring it up higher than the dump brought it down.

???


Short sellers are going to get absolutely raped soon.  I've grown to really dislike the tactics the bears have used to scare people.  They will get what they deserve.
yes
Go sideways m8
Short
Long lazyness, short brain power. 
Stay out of position until the direction becomes clearer. 
shlong
Middle
If you can’t afford to play with .02 btc you have no business trading on margin anyways. 
Try a casino.
You are in crypto trying to trade with $7-8? This is lambo land son you are not welcome here
Margin is definitely not for poor people like you.
Poloniex, Bitfinex, Quionex come to mind.

Poloniex is shady as fuck and has slow/blocked withdrawals. Bitfinex is better but has a precedent of being hacked. Quionex has almost zero support if something goes wrong. Pick your poison.
Bitfinex is probably the go to choice, I think you can also do it on OKex and Huobi? Not sure about those two. 
Dude my comment directly underneath yours is long term bearish and it’s not being downvoted in droves.
What drives a market if not sentiment? If sentiment is bullish, trade accordingly. From what I see, bears have no case other than their favorite ad hominen buzzwords -- "bag holder," "delusional," and that oldie-but-goodie "goblin town." 

Seriously, what is the bear case? That it's down from the ATH?
Well, there’s not a lot of pure traders on this sub. Most have implicit interest (and dare I say bias) in viewing the tech as revolutionary, transformative. Even most of the “bears,” that post here love bitcoin, and short it to protect capital and then reinvest to increase their stack. So yes, this sub is inherently bullish biased. 
That’s basically this sub reddit for the past week :)

Ultimately only people who don’t hold enough coins want it to go down.
Everyone came to buy and sell at the same time
I'm seeing a bear flag in a bear flag. Flagception.
Im seeing Bulls trying to stop an Inv. Cup and Handle from completing.  But have come up against a strong resistance line that originates from the top of our move. All of this inside a huge bear flag.

Inv. Cup and Handel has a target of around $7000

https://www.tradingview.com/x/FGLWmITQ/  
Well, I see a cup&handle on the 15 min.

https://i.imgur.com/rkUAnBS.png
I was setting 2-3% stops for the past month and lost 5-6% of my trading stack...it’s ridiculous even for crypto.
Yeah patience for another decades. Gl
What does DCB stand for?
If we drop to 3,700, I still have money on the sidelines with a ~~OTC~~ retail exchange. I'll be gobbling up goblin town prices. I don't think it will be that long before we see 8k again, likely before sub 5k, even if it's only temporary. I will probably add down to about 5.5k.
you are crazy if you think $3700 will come before relief rally
either from here or from $6,500, $6,100, $5,800, $5400, $5100, $4800

now granted, if this is still a bear market, that rally will run out of juice at $8,500 or $9,000


> We're also about to close the week under the 50 period MA for the first time in 3 years.

can't see that on bitfinex/bitstamp
Are they? Is it advisable to start mining with gpus now?
the problem is that when a reversal does happen, it will be like the BGD that set this off. One minute you can buy at $7,000.....the next the price is already at $8,000 and climbing hard as all the shorter stop losses get triggered 
so we either have a massive cascade capitulation sell off or we bounce here.

I think a bounce is more likely.

[deleted]
Yeah I look at that chart and see so much downside potential. Don't know how many times we gotta knock on 6k before it's pretty damn obvious bottom market structure isn't gonna autonomically just occur there.
Your decision sounds like capitulation to me. Maybe better buy?
>Edit: Fuck it. I'm gonna go sell all my crypto now. I'm officially out.

This is why you have a plan BEFORE about what to do. not to get caught in emotions
Based on a chart..? 
There still is Sunday before it closes below. This panic could just be filling the market makers bags before the run up. Or it could be btc is dead and it closes below, but you kinda panic sold before it confirmed below.
[deleted]
It's probably not a metric that people watch. Everyone's watching our current macro triangle. Even if we close below the 50ma, we'll attempt a bounce at the bottom of the triangle. The market is oversold enough so that it's possible for the bulls to steal the show for a short period.

The likelihood is low for just a BRD through support without a bounce or a period of consolidation right at support.
You expect that based on what?
No, I decided to wait. I wrote it in the comment you just replied to.


>Yesterday I said I would sell immediately but that was irresponsible to consider doing that so I have decided to wait
Nope. Take the bad with the good or go trade stocks 
Well, let's see... ;) For now bulls just need to maintain sideways. Eventually bears and naive shorters will give up and... I'm only concerned if it *closes* and stays below the long term support. Wicks are my friend.
sorry you are right, mechanically i was looking at the wicks at xbteur. 
PS: I'm not talking about reversal, just the possibility of a decent bounce. The other scenario is... big candles... down.
There are eight different species of bear! The North American Black Bear, the Brown Bear, the Polar Bear, the Asiatic Black Bear, the Spectacled Bear, the Giant Panda, the Sloth Bear, and the Sun Bear!
Bulltards just make the bear market longer. Hopium is one hell of drug
oh yes I totally agree. I think the fact that the majority is bullish after having bought in is bearish as hell because there aren't many new people coming into the space. this was a huge blow off top and they're all waiting for someone else to buy/baghold for them. it'll sink down, i'm 90% sure of it
yea idk why people give him shit, if you traded off his signals you'd actually make a decent profit each time. you just can't degen 20x+ leverage and hope for the best
They may take our big green dildo's, but they can never take our spirits!......  especially my cabernet sauvignon.
"This time is different"

Market never changes. Its controlled by Fear and Greed and that will never change. The fear of your wealth vanishing is more painful than the fear of missing out on potential gains.
Did you keep your short open from early april when you were also calling for new lows and then kept quiet for a couple weeks? Seems like your hibernation is over lol. 
Other than some super easy liquidations..
except some HFT bot 
That's what I was thinking!  They are market buys and sells.  Isn't that considered wash trading though?  Or am I using the wrong term?  I thought that was illegal.
i miss the trollbox... i fondly remember all the times i would get bored and spam it with stupid things like "guys guys! new scientific research shows that people shorting (coin name) right now have an average IQ of just 83!" and get banned for it. Polo was the place to trade shitcoins during the march to June altcoin bubble of 2017, and nowadays i can't get any limit orders filled on any trading pair at all during quiet times of day. I've never had any problems with polo yet, no stuck withdraws or forced verification or anything

EDIT: HAHAHAH OH MY GOD I JINXED IT oh no my money :(
i think its a number of things

1. the fees, why pay more when you don't have to?(this also affects the volume). 
2. minimum order limits, its just not designed for smaller traders. So you remove the small time traders playing with their lunch money, and your fee structure drives the bigger traders to your competitors
3. frankly they fucked over way too many people by crashing during critical movements 
4. KYC, they took way more anally than most other exchanges, which was fine when they were the big dog in the space where people were willing to deal with the BS just to get on the platform, but is completely unacceptable for a small exchange 
5. lack of new coins, they haven't added shit since they added BCH. the marginable coins have been the same few coins since 2 years ago, its like development completely stopped 
Them and Bittrex owned it, not anymore. 
Poloniex has been an OG for a while. I remember they got hacked in like 2014 after they opened and they paid us all back, at their expense, really quick. In a world where exchanges got hacked and did jack shit about it (gox, crypsy, mintpal), that was refreshing.

They just couldn't handle the crypto surge in 2017 so they got left behind.
Funds are safe
thanks
Made it mahself :)
so why is there bullish divergence this time around?

Also: have you seen this? Macro-consolidation is soon over: https://www.tradingview.com/x/ZkXTfGBZ/

Hmm. There seems to be some kind of confluence. 
I don't know. I said that because the february contracting dragon, had a tighter BB. My guess would be somewhere just before/after monthly close

But a massive dump to 6k or lower does not follow from this current market at all.

[deleted]
What are the alternatives tho? Seems all have higher fees, less volume, and more hoops to jump
thats def part of it, its such a pain in the ass to verify on exchanges that most people don't bother taking their business elsewhere

what they don't realize is that this is costing them money. If you aren't on the largest exchange, it means you actually lose money because when a dump happens, there is just not enough volume on the buy side, so you take a bigger loss. 

hell even when you just want to close a regular position during normal trading, on a big exchange you can just put your order in and it'll get filled immediately(or market sell and take .00001% slippage). On a smaller exchange, you have to take up to 5-10% slippage just to do the same, because the only volume on there is from arbitrage bots, so you need to make it worth their while  
Yeah, but someone has to make market orders or trading doesn't happen.
i don't agree , at r/cryptocurrency most people are bearish actually which is suprising 
That's right. The cryptocurrency chatroom on tradingview is surprisingly full of bulls too.
Well, I hate to say it but ETHTrader is a shit show compared to what it used to be. Just a bunch of people soiling their panties when the price is dropping and screaming MOON when it's slightly rising like baboons only to downvote you to oblivion when you disagree short term. 
Wat
OTC isn't some magic service. They're just market makers who operate across multiple exchanges to utilize all available liquidity in the market at once so they can move larger amounts.

In other words, they're buying and selling from the same places you are. 
HODLing has turned small money into big money for nine years running so I'm not sure why anyone expects anything different. Idiots indeed...
Said with such confidence.
Hahha soo much hopium eh. Yeah cheap should later btc is 5k
That is new money. 
That logic reminds me a little bit of this meme:
 https://m.imgur.com/gallery/q46L4QH

Replace throw with "buy" and take with "sell".

they can't take the money. it'll just stay there and become a liability. unless someone with legal knowledge can tell if they can take it after a period of time?
GS isn't stupid.  Cha-ching.

They never said they would drop the withdrawal limit though
$0 is $0, $2.5k became $0. Not sure about $25k, to my knowledge it hasn't moved
$25K means you are verified.
Just go to the Poloniex site.

"We are now requiring that all legacy Poloniex accounts become verified through the latest version of our verification portal. If you have a legacy account, you will not have the ability to use Poloniex until your profile verification is complete. We are asking everyone to take action within the next 14 days. We appreciate your cooperation in this process."

There in the bottom right
Fundus are safu
I've never had problems with them before, but this really fucking sucks. I made a ticket today. Waiting patiently 
Don't know. It could be a good ol' Goldman Sachs ploy to take money from people.
Some exchanges are getting extreme and asking for all kinds of documents, even if you verify.  One guy with Changelly says they wanted to know the source of his funds and he said that he mined them.  So they demanded receipts for all his mining equipment.  They are going to make it impossible to get your money back out.  It is just grand theft crypto.
Damn right, upboated!
Ok, if you're forced to buy at a high price, those coins go directly to the exchange?

But why then such a sharp drop afterwards? This happened the second time in 24h now:

Price shoots up, shorts get rekt, price drops down deep.
> Shorts never had bitcoin.

What about on Bitmex? Its all btc based there and they have the highest volume in the world. you need btc to short the perp contract on bitmex, and when you close your short you receive more btc.  Unless i am just confused lol
on Okex. I think it was 100 million
On Bitmex if you short you have to buy back the coins because its all crypto, 95% sure thats how it works.  On Kraken though where they have fiat options you can short and when you close the position you are full fiat still. 
It’s a good/bad thing for trading mindset. Treat it like you just put your entire paycheck into it instead of eating for 3 days, your going to trade like one careful motherfucker. 

Treat it like world of Warcraft gold, 50x Lev short on any 75$ bounce from bottom. Next bull run, when our accounts reach the hundreds of thousands, it will then feel more than real 
Actually cashing out bigger part of my profits helped with my trading...
Here some hopiums
Pretty torn on what to do with profits. Cashing out is always ideal, but buying more alt coins is addicting 
Las Vegas, where strippers/hookers make you feel ugly and poor. 
Have you increased your trading stack more, or the amount of STD’s you have 
Bitcoin did 9/11
I mever understood what was funny about jokes like these. Still don’t get it
I certainly wouldn't base decisions on it, but I do feel having an idea of a general sentiment does afford some kind of usefulness. In this instance it's something I have seen a hell of a lot of people say. If anything I only noted it so I could come back and see if it had any noticable influence. 

Social media is a great data indicator, even more so in crypto than stocks, but on a wholesale data level, not a sample size of friends

Renaissance Technologies very successfully used social media data (and other data sources) to deliver outstanding returns for many years in stocks
Hmm. Well this sub is mainly depressed gambling addicts, so probably not the greatest resource either.
Volume going up was slightly higher than rejection volume
I’ll add as we re test, for now I’d rather have my foot in the door. We’ve been above 7k for sometime now I’m sensing a nice green/red candle soon enough. I’ll plan accordingly, for now anticipate the unexpected.
Yea 50+ million dollars of sell wall is not suppression at all, just the regular stay at home moms doing their thing.
Yeah, multiple hidden sell walls of 10k+ ETH is definitely just regular market movements. 
If we reference our latest trip to 9980~, we dropped 26% until now, while ETH had a 32% drop from 835. 
Is there evidence for this?
> since we now know

How do we *know* that?
While you could be right about the cause of the market sell-off, your post is a bit inconsistent.

> frankly to me it seems like noone knows whats going on, and everyone is looking for a pattern to justify their trades

> since we now know the marketwide sell off was due to the BFX investigation

Which is it!? :D
How is this comment any helpful in explaining the massive ETH hidden sell wall?
The answer is i have no clue whats happening with these walls, thats why i wanted to start a discussion. Still very interesting to see whats gonna happen once these walls are finally bought up.
[OP's monitor](https://images.techhive.com/images/idge/imported/imageapi/2014/10/14/12/1_18-100522229-primary-idge.jpg)
Love is love
Thanks!
Just do what i did, create a fake google account. 
You just need it to login. ;)
So far only a few have their own channels. The others will share the default channel. Have you added their channels to pushbullet? 
When you subscribe to the users the bot will return the channel in a PM.
Just subscribe again and you will get the channels.

By the 2nd one you should find the pattern :) 
They clearly don't seem to understand that they can dump the same coins for a higher price if they just let the price push. 

They are doing the ultimate wreckage to themselves by missing that opportunity and by selling their coins right at down. lol. 
How so? You mean for the b-bands to tighten?
If you're expecting a BGD like the one in April you're going to be waiting a long time imo. Shorts were at a record high at the time and fuelled the pump, since then shorts have been largely outweighed by longs.
But we did this around $6800, went up, came back down and are close to the same place. We may be due for a small leg up, but not sure its trend changing?

Edit : I thought the same thing at $6800.
6 months of this type of action could create a mega-pop situation.  
quick bart up to what 12k?

Big companies are finally now batching
Yea everyone switched to lightning network to buy stickers.  Makes perfect sense.
It is number of transactions, not volume.
https://blockchain.info/charts/estimated-transaction-volume-usd?timespan=2years

maybe 2-3x in estimated value

number of transactions is still gonna surely still be comparable on terms of amount of actual use though?
Yeah this has been an annoying spiral of cognitive dissonance.

One major reason transactions have gone down that is often brushed off is the crowding out of use cases by high fees.

Things like Satoshi dice, games built on counterparty, and many others have had their use cases kind of ruined by very high fees.

You may argue that fees are now and operation of blocks is not full and the chain is working fine. But real businesses are not designing for your best case edge, they are designing for scale and global use.

Aside from just pressure from fees, many of the entrepreneurs who run these businesses have been as much as told that the BTC chain is not the place to put their business because it is not for them. Thia point has been hammered home again and again by the most recent leaders of the Bitcoin Core Dev team. I would rate them somewhere between poor and terrible as stewards of the original blockchain protocol over the past two years.

A huge wave of adoption with a perfectly functioning, scaled lightning network would prove me wrong, but that chart certainly supports the picture I illustrate in this comment.
if we could get txs down to 0 that would be really bullish!
Read the whitepaper: it was the answer to the 2008 financial crisis
BCH Transactions are also down

https://bitinfocharts.com/comparison/bitcoin%20cash-transactions.html
Yes... And let's also go back to 2011 and pick up all the drops there as well... When will you chartologists learn that temporal information matters and that your charts are nothing but choose your own adventure novels?
Yeah, another one at 574 I saw from earlier, looks like $569 finally broke.

Crazy...  wonder what it means... EOS unloading perhaps?
Roughly 12 hours and almost 200k eth. 
It’s the other wall, 569 was eaten and now 574 is the next to be eaten.
But they would only sell if they expected the price to go down.

It doesnt matter where you bought bitcoin at, it only matters where the price is now, how much you have and whether you think it will go up or down.

Surely you must know this... I mean... please tell me you know this.

Theres a name for his... is it the sunk cost fallacy?
We haven't seen panic selling yet. Panic selling will be like the 10k to 20k run we had last Dec but in reverse. I think it will go below 1k and then we can start talking about bottoms. 
If you draw a rising support line between the 6000 and 6500 bottoms, it’s currently around 6800-6900.  Losing 6800 with conviction means we’ve broken the consolidation pattern bearish.

6400 is horizontal support.  If you don’t believe in diagonal trend lines (ala TheChartGuys) you would look for a weekly lower low, the last one being 6450 on GDAX and give or take elsewhere.
6400 was the last bottom when we dropped below 7k

We then barted back to 6800, back down to 6400, back to 6800, started a steady climb to 6900 and then barted to 6800 before we got the BGD
1k is too low. Your analysis of the situation is approximately correct but the price estimation is wayyy off. The price could fall to 3k and would bounce hard for at least two months. Even 3k would be months off. If 1k was the direction to go, that's a path that will take closer to 2 years. 
that is so insanely ridiculous, I don’t know what to tell you or how to help you.

It could happen... I just think it won’t.

You forget that people who sold their coins at 10k+ will most likely gladly show up to buy them back at 2-3k

Your comment is beyond ludicrous in my opinion
Yes, but at what valuation.

The market could find VeChain's value sits at $30,000,000 market cap.
[deleted]
At risk of sin bin for discussing and shilling alts, I have to throw ICX in the pot. They are building a large network before going forward, they know blockchain has limited uses in the industry so they first want to explore the use cases first. Hold dapp panels from all projects including ethereum and eos and score them by industry giants, 300 dapps are planned I think.  Strategic partners such as line and Samsung. The loop is leading blockchain service provider in South Korea and is the block chain arm of DAYLI, a multi billion dollar fintech giant. A long term hold, but one of the few with any potential
Apparently I was unaware this was happening and missed the 14 days.  I don’t log in there often.
The verification is something new.
You would rather lose the money than do the verification?
Tbf to Poloniex they announced this was happening on 27th Dec last year. Sent multiple emails and listed on their website.

I’m guessing the push for verified accounts was something they needed to do for the Circle purchase.

Edit: Didn’t realise they said the $2k withdraw would stay in place. If so, that’s dodgy if they’re now reducing it to zero.
Why did you delete all your comments threatening to dox me?
https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8mfh3f/daily_discussion_sunday_may_27_2018/dznfgoa/?context=3

https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8m7np4/daily_discussion_saturday_may_26_2018/dznau7c/?context=3

https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8m7np4/daily_discussion_saturday_may_26_2018/dzmsnxd/

This isn't shilling, covert or otherwise? I see this kind of shilling all the time in this sub. It's rampant or at least a lot worse then it's been previously, in my view.
> Don't read too much from the karma. Someone runs bots that downvote everything that goes against the bcash narrative.

Yeah it really does seem like something like that is going on. 

>But yeah I miss the times when it was the ethtrader shills doing the raiding. Saints indeed.

Those guys at least have some sort of plausible narrative around smart contracts and their supposed value. BCashers have nothing but straws to grasp at. Then they have the gall to accuse Bitcoiners of being 'fearful' that BCash is going to flip it any day now. Uh, no, it's just obnoxious and unwarranted. They would be much better off if they focused on improving the tech and appeal, instead of arguing over Satoshi and the term *Bitcoin* all day long. BCash is an alt, plain and simple, and mods should institute bans for shills that break the rules. 
My take was /u/gypsytoy is concerned about the repeating of common statements - without adding anything new or relevant to this forum. If that's happening then for sure I agree we don't need that spam on here.

p.s. bcash
> Sounds like you are scared and think BCH is an actual threat to your investments, whilst you feel ETH is just a different product.

This is literally exactly what I'm referring to. This is covert shilling, gtfo. I already have you tagged as a shill, this just affirms it.

>You then form some ideas as to why you "really" hate BCH so much.

No, I said that this shilling is out of hand. You're proving my point. 

>There is a free market, over time we will see what happens, right now the prices are based on predictions of future deliveries and growth. Let the best products win.

That's fine but no need to co-cop Bitcoin branding and pretend like BCash is winning when every metric looks terrible. This is a Bitcoin sub, not a BCash sub. 
Being the better fork its not that shocking..who the hell is buying the other fork that is 7x more expensive?
Pure insanity.
maybe Bollinger himself?
He truly ~~was~~ is a hero.
yes
I do think this is a big part of it. If you're sane (i.e. not me) you'd probably decide that doing anything at this level is pretty fucking risky.
Because.. a new pattern is starting. https://www.tradingview.com/x/PSsegwo0/

May is closing soon. I wonder where june will open up. Oh wait, you don't watch the chart that truly matters. 
In Bitcoin higher highs tend to follow higher lows, of which I count three since February. Of course this could stay flat or even go down for a little while longer, but it's pretty spring loaded at this point. Some big dumb whale has to cover the coins they borrowed to create this little dip over the past month. Assuming 30-day terms, we should see it start to rise this week and perhaps continue for a month or so. Would not short this right now, that's for sure.
It does make me wonder if we're going to see another $800 BGD like in April again.
That's like a medal for finishing last , does it even matter?to me it's looks like BTC  dropped 2.5k and shows no sign of recovery 
Agreed. Capitulation, several months of the price fluctuating by several hundred dollars either way, no silly market manipulation. This coupled with Lightening maturity and the next halvening should drive the next cycle.
so it'll either never get there or it won't bounce. 
Celtics fan spotted.
To be fair I genuinely have a suspicion that my cat may be Bogdanov. I can't help but notice that every time that I mention my position in the presence of my cat I get stopped out. 
Well I disagree with those people. This thing has been destined for the bottom of this wedge since failing to break through.

https://imgur.com/LbWbGpx
sure it can, but it wont. be patient, the market will make a move it always does. people said that when it stalled at 9.9k and countless times before. 
Yeah I guess I can understand the over-invested  aspect.  I just thought that this subreddit was supposed to be focused on trading which to be successful requires you to be detached from your outside feelings on the asset.  I personally love the idea of bitcoin and want it to be successful and I am actually bullish on a very very long time horizon but I don't really see any reason to be bullish at the moment.  I just wish that people could post with a bearish sentiment and not be downvoted/attacked in comments for no valid reason aside from having an emotional vested interest in bitcoin's upward price movement.But then again, I guess it's people like that who have been fueling my profits this past week.
Good points. I'd add, if you are interested enough in Bitcoin to be browsing a sub called "Bitcoin Markets", you've more than likely convinced yourself this whole thing is a good idea. If it were to fail and the price collapse, that's a failure on your overall sense of judgement as well.
Loud breathing and grunting are against the rules at planet fitness.
I'm not a narc.
A hidden bear div on the 4-6H chart would indicate a _continuation_, which probably should continue on for a bit more than one 5% drop. But I’m not entirely sure. I think the hidden bear div is still “active” in that sense.
right.  that was a typo.  fixed.
I have a habit of drawing these types of support lines and they never pan out, so if you must use me as part of your sentiment analysis, I am okay with that.

Edit: In all seriousness, if you were a robot, that line is resistance turned support and we should treat it as such until it breaks.
I love it when the bears start getting cocky because it shows how frantic they really are.  The trend is up, and y'all are about to rekt on an epic scale.
Unfairly downvoted, you're exactly right. The smart people switched to taking profit from the downtrend rather than losing money to it.
It probably won’t change too drastically. Stock market investors are predominantly male (85%). The reason is that women have far less pressure / social status to gain from being a high earner. Evolutionary biology dictates that women are much more risk-averse. If you think about it, the reasons are pretty obvious. Someone has to protect and nurture the children while the men go hunting. We can’t really get past evolutionary biology, and that’s no bad thing.
Or better yet, here's the infographic! https://i.imgur.com/zAsGc8E.jpg

Thanks for the tag!
Jesus Christ. What you call "misogynist replies" are simply people pointing the fact that women are a minority in cryptos. If a women came here for discussing bitcoin trading I would not make any mean comment about her.

This whole oppression concept that is supposed to explain all the inequalities in the world is such a childish and ridiculous thing.
Have you ever thought about the probability that we are simply made unequals with different kind of interests ?

Men are smart and courageous enough to get into crypto and make huge profits.  Women are not.  That's what it comes down to, and speaking generally of course and there are many exceptions to the rule.

And Reddit is slanted very SJW/misandrist at this point, which is off putting to men, but we still endure and soldier on through it.
[removed]
Increasing my stack has been fun and all but, I really hope that giant triangle breaks up...those downside targets make my balls tingle.  
I agree. It definitely feels like it could break down here but there have been a ton of fake outs both above and below. Shorts have been climbing while we are down here, though, which could soften our fall if we break down.
I'm not sure what you mean. I usually enter a position after a confirmed move, and then set the stops above BE. This time I suffered a one percent loss. Edit: Which is a small, yes almost insignificant loss. It's just annoying because it was avoidable. People have different trading strategies, and each trader also will apply different strategies for different scenarios. I've taken bigger losses before. If the reward is worth the risk you have to accept that what you risked came true, or else don't trade, of course.
Yeah, I saw the bounce when I got up. Small one though.
I think we might consolidate for a day or two between 7,200 and 7,500. And the longer we consolidate the worse it is for bulls. The RSI is quite at the bottom and if we go down to 6,950 straight away then we. There will be better chances for a bigger bounce (maybe even trend reversal). 
>Seems like they have been making more than you lately.

The price hasn't made a new low in nearly 4 months so I'm very curious about what are you basing that strange conclusion on.
Literally the dumbest thing I've read today. Can we banish these people back to /r/cc?
5x account balance?
shlong it is!
So a put and call option then? :P
I just made a few dollars shorting doge, so... 

I want to have a small fund to play around with in the altcoins. $120 per limit order per margin position isn't very affordable, with a $230 "let's mess around with the altcoins" fund that's split equally between margin and exchange. That fund is slowly growing, thanks to some good calls I'm making... Maybe in time, the altcoin fund will grow to 0.04
$7-$8 per limit order.

But I'm a small trader, so fuck me, right? It's all about those million dollar positions on high margin that are basically gambles. Can't have small positions or trades. I remember Bitstamp had a $5 min order back in 2016. Wonder what it is now... But then again, they don't do margin. It's hard finding the right exchange. 
Welp, that sucks.

I prefer "small trader", rather than "poor". I'm working with ~$100 worth of bitcoin for margin. 0.015 btc. $100 worth of bitcoin in January 2017 was 0.12btc
Wasn't Poloniex bought by some U.S. company?  Or am I thinking of a different exchange?
^
Thank you! I'd never have thought of Quionex
Thanks! I'll check em out.
As a self described permabear, I'd suggest that you turn your mind the other way and ask yourself, why should BTC go up again? 

Interest in bitcoin is down, and all the ATH did was demonstrate just how useless Bitcoin is as a currency. Fees became absurd as did transaction times, and the reality is that Bitcoin's advantages are irrelevant to the vast majority of people.

Don't get me wrong - I genuinely love the idea of a decentralised currency that isn't controlled by any one individual or organisation, but the reality is that most people don't care. They just want something that's easy to use, fast and with low transaction fees, and credit cards already fulfil that purpose. 
Majority of commenters seem to be perma.bears though
How many coins are enough coins?
The people who know what they're doing don't comment about what they want to happen, they comment about what they think will actually happen.

The reality of price action unfolds independently of how much crypto you are holding.

I think you may know this but your comment ignores it.
Did you checked these in the right order? :D 
That's just a wonky pair of baps you drew ;-)
Catastrophic stops is like...5%+ off your entry
Do you truly believe that?
Digital Currency Bounce aka Dead Cat Bounce
Dead cat bounce
Dead Cat Bounce
dead cat bounce
Dried pussy pounding
Dead cat bounce. 
Yeah as long as you have a plan for if the price goes down significantly, which I think it will. I can see it retesting the 50 week MA at some point and maybe by then the average will be above $8K, but I suspect it'll be rejected. 
I didn't say it was going down straight down to $3700. It'll probably make it to $5K before 8.5K though and chances are strong it gets to $3K before then as well. 
https://www.tradingview.com/x/OV3AmYor/

This yellow line. Blue arrows were times it served as support. Yellow, resistance. Red when it crossed down and green when it crossed up.
https://www.tradingview.com/x/CSpHLcHB/

https://www.tradingview.com/x/AXHQvngd/
\>  Are they? Is it advisable to start mining with gpus now? 

Would like a  semi\-informed reply to this question as well... I'd also like to know if the answer is yes then what specifically are you mining that's still turning a profit at these prices?
> I think a bounce is more likely.

This. I do not see any sells unless the price goes higher. 
I'd tend to agree - the likelihood of bouncing off the lower trendline at around 6900 is pretty high. The question is: is it a sustainable move or will it be a selling opportunity if it were to happen?
Depends on how it break, if ever.
I can’t believe it took me this fucking long to realize that I’ll never get any positive returns from crypto. I’ve lost over $1,000 which is a fuckton for me, and still I was too stubborn to let go. 
One guy ragequits crypto, bull run inevitable!
Sounds like it's a rational, calculated decision based on data to me.
bullish signal. Couple more of these and bulls are in luck
This is the best advice of all.

Decide in advance what suits your current lifestyle / risk you want to take.
It’s not as if literally every single person in this entire subreddit use charts for their trading decisions.
You mean based on TA?

Which gives a statistically same outcome as using random chance?

Massey University study will provide insightful reading.
The reality is that the 50 MA is always going to be crossed in a long term bear market.  Think about what this indicator is saying.  It's saying the price today is lower than the average price of the past 50 days? weeks? not sure what units you're using.  But ultimately all it means is that we've been in an extended period of dropping prices.  
Yeah makes sense. I wonder how important a short squeeze is in aiding that bounce. If we're going to go into a full blown redistribution phase, I'd argue a short squeeze is almost critical. If just a bounce, then squeeze is just a nice to have. 
on hopium.
I'm gonna start a GoFundMe to save bitcoin.

But yeah, everyone is bearish above support and before the weekly closes below the 50MA. I'll turn bearish after support breaks and the weekly closes below 50MA, not before.
I am against most all regulation but if the exchanges become so corrupt, it will be very difficult to trade profitably.   The system is already gamed against most traders.
Good bot
I've never seen it comment about bulls.
Not sure why your response got downvoted?

What number do you expect or target when you say you think it'll sink down? lower than the lows made this year?
Market never changes. Wow, so 10 billion equals 400 billion. Go take your noble prize, apparently economy misses your golden rule.
Yes the REAL bear market is about to begin. Muahahahaha
It’s only wash trading if they are buying or selling into their own limit orders... this? This is just strange...

At best its just a stress test of their trading engine.
The amount of money he's wasting not only on the price difference but on the fee is crazy. It's not wash trading
The March to June alt coin bubble?

March to June was the beginning. 
I think they got rid of it because of how embarrassed they were about the people with unresolved tickets and when people would say that the platform had crashed. I remember going to Poloniex one day and seeing the troll box say that it crashed, I didn't bother logging in.

Which reminds me. Logging in is a pain in the ass now, and almost impossible on my mobile because it refreshes chrome whenever I leave and come back to it. I had to check my email and copy it to the textbox without leaving the chrome browser... Which was hard until I figured out how often my mail notifications came up. Now, it's possible to log inti the page on mobile... It's just a huge pain in the ass. 
My funds are just play money. Just wanted to scalp my earlier shorts. 
Cool indi, looks interesting. Don't like the ideas of 'organic moves' though. Those bears don't seem to realise volume is lowest before the break.
Use whatever you want to back up the bullish narrative. Watch in disbelief as we plummet to new lows...
I’d honestly love to know how they made it worse...did they outsource they UI development to Netgear or something?  
Those new vibrant colors must have been expensive!!
Because every person on r/cryptocurrency is a NANO holder and NANO is absolutely shitting the bed right now
This is just so accurate. Its a shitshow and moonkids who does only shitpost or hatepost or both
I understand this, people like /u/Vanteyx speak about OTC buys like they don't impact the market.
Hodling doesn't work when shit ton of people expect to get rich by simply doing nothing. Because it happened in the past doesn't mean anything.
The reverse is also true in a bear market, especially a market based 100&#37; on rampant speculation.

I'm sure those who bought and "hodled" since January are very happy...
Exactly. Buy $20m worth today and in 2 years you’ve made the easiest money a human could ever make.


They almost certainly can convert it from a liability at some point, but it must be a long period of time, likely 5\+ years.
> Not sure about $25k, to my knowledge it hasn't moved

Seems like it. When I saw your post about Polo, out of curiosity I logged in to check, I see the verification notice but there are no changes with my account withdrawal, may be I am verified thats why, but you said withdrawal for all accounts so checked.

Either way, Polo had it's day's. Guess they are history now.
Yes it is. 

> all account limits to $0.

This tingled my bells, even though I have 0% on there. lol
25k is a joke
This is all because of your loving governments.. putting pressure on everyone to spy on everyone else. Guilty until proven innocent.  Gov is like a school yard bully, you have to kiss their ass or they will steal your lunch! Why not go after actual crimes and not buying and selling cause, in a free world that is not a crime.  
Thanks. Sounds pretty uncool.
At least a funny ass vid was made from our exchange freezing woes
3 months
It's not the exchanges driving this, it's the legislation bringing exchanges in line with other asset management systems.
Market makers are buying up low, forcing shorts to stop out and then dumping the coins they just bought.

It’s easy with low volume and low liquidity.
You are ignoring longs closing, taking profit after such spikes.
yes shorters on bitmex get paid in bitcoin and they all say they liquidate into cash but none of them do.  Money going into bitmex even to short is positive for bitcoin.  It's just another use case for bitcoin, a zero-sum-game casino.


that's called gettin greedy

> On Bitmex if you short you have to buy back the coins because its all crypto, 95% sure thats how it works

technically you are not buying or selling any bitcoins with futures, just "pieces of paper" (contracts -- digitally) which you settle for (profit/loss) in BTC; 

in theory you can long/short more than 21 million BTC (not 21 million USD, but 21 million BTC), which is "physically" impossible with real bitcoins.
Was referring to "They have their bags full of unwanted coins
Sell them as fast as they can"
lol yes but then you freak out when you realize it's real money. there's no way i'd ever put this much money on the line for anything else in my life right now but it's fine with trading. well it sucked at first when I lost a lot but making it back felt nice. now I'm used to winning and losing and it doesn't tilt me so much
>Next bull run, when our accounts reach the hundreds of thousands

Except, there is no guarantee of another epic bull run.

Where is the money going to come from?  To hit the previous ATH we needed mass hysteria, global news coverage, everyone in the office buying...well most people got badly burnt, and told their friends that crypto is one giant scam.

You wait until the SEC drop the hammer on the ICOs they've been investigating.
both, I shall do the math with the exact percentages and update here
BIN LADEN IS SATOSHI
Someday when the Caliphate rules over all of mankind, you'll realize (inshallah) EXACTLY how funny it really is...
> Social media is a great data indicator

Ok, so it's a great "data indicator" (whatever that empty term means to you).  It doesn't change the fact that it is poor information/data to be used in making BTC trading decisions.
I wouldn't normally defend this sub either, but comparatively the people in this sub are Stephen fucking Hawking.
Obviously someone with a huge amount of eth is exiting, but suppression (to me at least) implies some sort of nefarious purpose.  

Sadly, we'll never truly know the reason that many are being sold at this level.  We can only speculate.
Any idea how much was sold in those hidden walls?  I counted 25k+ before I went to sleep.
If we compare it to the previous lows ETH is still up 50% while BTC is up only 10%. 
No, just ethrader finding a convenient guilty party.

Just as eth was about to turn around 180° and make a new ath! /s

https://www.tradingview.com/x/46TY90Yg
because the sell off happened a few days before the news drop, it happened while everyone was wondering why there was no bounce(if it was a technical dump it wouldn't have been a straight line down like we had, there would have been bounces along the way)...someone was insider trading, someone knew the news, and they got out of their position while the rest of us were buying the dip because they knew they had only a few days left to unwind their position 
I agree, the conversation helps us figure out what's going on. Just wanted to share what it has looked like to me, considering it looks like a bear flag on the 4 hr chart and ETH is pretty close to its peak still. In fact, I doubled down on my short yesterday with this in mind. Granted, I'm a bit bearish on Bitcoin right now as well, so take that with a grain of salt.
Fair enough :)
Yeah, clicked the link sent to me by the bot then clicked follow on the pushbullet site. 
Where can I see who has own channel?
Got it, thanks!
What makes you think the price will push? Who's to say the price isn't just rising because of whales pushing it back up themselves so they can drop it again?
you realize they've done this two times already?
Everyday the size of the market is increasing and more and more of the float is being pulled off the market.  Sellers and short-sellers have been able to keep the float higher than total demand to keep the price suppressed and people scared of a huge drop.  But they have not been able to crash the market which is what they have been hoping to do.  When this starts to turn bullish shorts will get completely destroyed.
ah my mistake 

to be fair 2 years ago Bitcoin was about actually being currency, there was a lot more ways to spend it. Nowadays its just something you trade with. Which I'm not saying is a good thing, but explains the drop off 
I think one of the reasons for that is that back then transactions were just sent willy nilly(one payment = one transaction). Nowadays exchanges and bulk payouts are batched together into a single transaction 


> Aside from just pressure from fees, many of the entrepreneurs who run these businesses have been as much as told that the BTC chain is not the place to put their business because it is not for them. Thia point has been hammered home again and again by the most recent leaders of the Bitcoin Core Dev team.

That's a good way to put it. Would I build on BTC for tx if I know that the roadmap is against low fees, and the chain will become bottlenecked if my app succeeds


> A huge wave of adoption with a perfectly functioning, scaled lightning network would prove me wrong, but that chart certainly supports the picture I illustrate in this comment.

Yup, that's the out. Business which are forward looking have to decide whether to build on *lightning* vs an alt, not BTC vs an alt. Since BTC is unviable long-term.

Then, from an investors perspective, we have to redefine how to measure the fundamental value of Bitcoin. What new metrics can we use to measure adoption if not onscale volume, etc.
Even one successful parasite app will bring a blockchain to it's knees.   For example, crypto kitties.    The primary use case of Bitcoin is to move bitcoins and even that is difficult at peak demand times (near ATH).
This is good for bitcoin! Who needs use cases when Venezuelans can have hard, sound digital money depreciating by only 80% instead of 90.
Yes, no one using Bitcoin would be Good for Bitcoin...also if every country banned it.
That’s great and all but NOTHING has changed.
In that you are wrong. If people using fractals paid more attention to time instead of price, it would be a lot more useful. Especially in a range bound market situation where it's one cycle up and one cycle down. 
It's not really 200k ETH since a lot of the volume since the walls appeared was also from people selling under the walls, but yeah, ridiculous amounts either way. Pretty sure this is actually the single biggest seller we've seen so far. 
Bullish?
[deleted]
Honestly it doesn't matter as the miners are probably the largest group of "smarter than the rest" considering how long they have been in the game. They will put downward pressure on the price in the longer term due to necessary cash flow for operations and best long term outlook.

So unless new money keeps coming in, miners will slowly bleed the excess value out of the market and there's a ton of room left for the price to fall.
based on what though? literally nothing.

You’re calling for a 95% correction off ATH. That has never happened since 2012 and liquidity is orders of magnitude higher.

This is a shitpost and nothing more
When you are dealing with assets tied to earnings, sure it can take much longer. When you're dealing with commodity assets, it can happen a lot faster than you think. We will see...
When the oil bubble popped in 08, CL future price went from roughly $160 to a low of $25 in under a year. Don't underestimate panic selling...
The only other time BTC has behaved this way, there was rough symmetry between ATH and breaking the downward trendlines and breaking the trendline and ultimately bouncing off of it at the local low. Should history repeats, local low is around 2k in 5ish months. 
I agree, if the price drops to $3k i will fully reload, absent a black swan event 
We will see who is right. Go ahead and save this post if you'd like.

BTW, the logic of people loading up at a much lower price is always flawed. People always say, "I would mortgage the house at BTC 3k." When 3k comes, nobody wants touch it..it's a flawed statement and you should stop using that example. People said the same thing about if it ever went below 10k..How'd that work out? 
IF BTC plummets, we surely will see an undershooting. If VEN is not able to establish its mainnet end of June, as promised, the price will tank. Other than that, the value proposition of VEN simply is too compelling. They cover maybe 20 different industries on many different technical levels \(IOT chips, AI and big data, enterprise DAPP platform, ICO platform\).

It's an improved version of ETH, which simply is not enterprise grade.

ETH has a giant head start, but VEN has the better tech and is geared to enterprise adoption.

In the long run, I see ETHs market cap as the benchmark, rather than your number.
>"It really does boil down to adding value. Not only to an industry attempting to supplant paper as we know it, but adding value in the eyes of those being supplanted. The initiatives that can seamlessly interface legacy systems will have the easiest time of it."  
>  
>Exactly. As much as I like BTC and XMR \(LTC I am unsure about, because of the competition with BCH, DASH and others, and the potential danger that it could be dominated by BTC after technical upgrades\), there is a lot of speculation involved. BTC could turn out to become an important world currency, it also could be seen as a danger by the legacy system and kept domesticated like gold. Who knows. Monero could be seen as the enemy or embraced by governments and intelligence agencies, in the light of enabling black op transfers. We don't know.  
>  
>But what I am sure about is, whoever offers their service to the big illu corporations, will thrive.  
>  
>Also, in the same context, but on a different level, whoever will solve concrete problems, instead of proudly presenting fantastic tech and then expecting everyone to applaud and set up working groups on how to utilze these innovatations \- whoever comes from the client site of things \- will thrive.  
>  
>That's why I am invested in VEN and not in ADA. I rather invest in businessmen, than tech nerds or academics. Tech is not the problem. Businessmen hire tech nerds and academics and fork or copy good tech solutions for free, if required.  
>  
>A group of nerds, on the other hand doesn't have the right contacts and doesn't know what business partners want to hear.
Can confirm, am bagholding too. 
Have they already blocked your account? 

I emailed them last week and they told me 14 days from today withdraw is still Ok. 

They seem to be shifting the goalposts if they are blocking people already...
What did I just say above?
>Edit: Didn’t realise they said the $2k withdraw would stay in place. If so, that’s dodgy if they’re now reducing it to zero.

Yes, that's the part you're missing. Everyone knew about all of this but nobody expected them to suddenly make funds completely unwithdrawable.
I never received any emails about this from them. This is the first I have heard of it.

this is now becoming harassment, its been a WEEK and you are still on this shit? For one, I never doxxed you by posting your info, I just told you to quit harassing people when your info was easily found. And you might also want to mention that me telling you to watch what you are saying was because you were telling people to harass other users just because they happen to vote republican. 

Does this sound familiar? 

>I found another trumptard! Feel free to tag him using RES so he can't spread his bullshit all over Reddit.

>Or you could click on the username I linked, read his posts which are all sourced and educate yourself.



know what? fuck it, I'm reporting you to the admins for harassment and letting them deal with someone who is obviously mentally unhinged.

and I didn't delete my comments, the admins/mods did, just like they deleted yours. 


So they are shills and they should be banned, but you talking trash about Bitcoin Cash literally all day long, is okay?  You shouldn’t be banned? 

How about you stop mentioning Bitcoin Cash altogether? Then you won’t get any down votes you need to create conspiracy theories around. And you won’t get any replies that upset your mental stability. 

And nobody has to get banned.  Including you. 
Just ignore them, it's all smoke and mirrors. Reddit doesn't matter.
Yes that in addition to the fact that this is a Bitcoin forum, not a BCash forum. There is a specific thread for alts and BCashers should do their bidding *there* if they going to do it at all. Keep these shills out of the daily and other threads that are focused on Bitcoin. All they do is spread misinformation and FUD. It's against the rules and the regulars that do this (I have a list) should be banned.
the only thing better about money is who you can pay with it
there is no need for any other bells and whistles.  Well and not getting robbed.


Lol, BCash shills are either unbelievably stupid or self-loathing trolls. Their arguments have degenerated to absolute rock bottom.
LMAO .. oh man
Someone gave them a Fenix Down. 

Edit: It was ineffective.
im just a long-term holder in cold storage. i bought in around 6200 back in nov. so i really dont care what happens on a day to day basis. im investing for the next year or two. i just come here to lurk to learn about market indicators and trading.
I'm doing plenty well enough, thanks. 
Do you refere to Lonterm Trend "up" and Medium term "correction"?  I am just Learning TA but while reading in my TA book I thought about that... funny you post it exactly after I read it 
Where's the proof this "little dip" was caused by a shorter?
Dont mind the plebs.
Nope. That was margin fueled short coverings. No one is shorting really. Longs still far outnumber shorts so a BRD is far more likely.
Then short the shit out of it

I think it’s insane to be shorting now, but that’s just me.

I’ve been here for a very long time and I stopped buyign at 1750 because I thought it was a huge bubble. 7200 is still insane to me when we used to think BTC might get to 3k if we activate SegWit
bitcoin has never fluctuated by such a small percentage over that long of a period of time. 2014 the end of the bear market was a $150-300 range. That's like $2500-5000...
In a rational market maybe!  A slow decline vs. a sharp decline is the main difference though.  A big red dildo to \<$6K would be a lot more bouncy than a 1 month slow trickle down.
How long have you been involved in any sort with Bitcoin?
get your shit together fat buritos
Haha no worries, you're more than just a data point to me! I just am not sure if three tests of a support line with lower highs is bullish. 
I wouldn't describe *him* as cocky. You might be thinking of /u/fuckharvey.
i'm not frantic at all :p and i'm not really penis-y either; I'm kind of preparing for some random shit to happen but as far as new lows I guess yea, I'm about as sure as I've ever been that it's happening here soon

the trend is up on an extremely long term scale. the trend could still be up on a monthly scale if we bottom at $3000. so there's a lot of room to go down
Pot kettle 
AHAHAHAHA TREND IS UP? what u mean VOLUME IS DOWN? 

Go long please. wanna have more hopiums?
Yeah, after a 30% drop you're definitely one of the smart ones if you're just starting to take profits...
I haven't seen any posts about preaching dollar cost averaging and buys every paycheck, etc.  Those used to be everywhere.
> Men are smart and courageous enough to get into crypto and make huge profits

It's because they're more likely to take risks. Not smarter. Testosterone.

That said, I'm a woman who's just gotten into LTC. But I also partake in risky sports and generally do man-things. Most women I talk to think I'm crazy or a badass, but in reality I probably just have more testosterone or something to a similar effect.

>Reddit is slanted very SJW/misandrist at this point, which is off putting to men

It's off-putting even to *me*. I think women aren't interested in crypto for the reason stated above. Culture has little to do with it.
[removed]
Stops are placed as market orders usually. You're probably paying a lot in fees by having your stops hit so often
[deleted]
Delusional.
with bitcoin, there is plenty of shlong for everyone 
No, Iron Condor. You only do what you just described (a straddle) when you think the underlying will move explosively in one direction or the other but you have no opinion on whether it will go up or down. If you think something will just trade sideways do an Iron Condor.
Not trying to be rude, but you just can't expect to margin trade with $7-$8 per limit order.

No matter what you want to be able to do, you have to operate under the constraints of the various marketplaces.  And, to my knowledge, you're not going to be able to do what you want anywhere.

Good luck.
My market maker fee on each trade is probably more than 0.015 lol it's all about opportunity cost.  Go YOLO or go home  
In February 2018 Poloniex, ranked as the 14th largest crypto exchange by data tracker CoinMarketCap.com with almost 100 tokens listed and daily volume of trading more than $150m, was acquired by Circle Internet Financial Ltd., a closely held mobile-payments firm backed by Goldman Sachs Group Inc.

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Poloniex
Credit cards do not have low transaction fees. The merchant fees are still paid out of the customers' pockets at the end of the day. 
pshht!
Anyone throwing around decades as a timeline in crypto is a fool.
Yup. Simple. Until all people who hold gold dead. Then we moved to digital gold. Takes time. Decade is short. 

Pretty sure most of people here are dumb as my pug  regarding blockchain tech.
My goodness there are so many idiots who have no business trading in this sub. I'm not saying I'm not one myself but this nigga can't even get DCB right. 
Haha I like this one :D
because in this market, you can hold off waiting for $5K and it never comes, and then you'll be stuck buying in higher

we have dropped far enough to a point where we could paint a higher low and get another BGD that sends us to $8.5K in a single candle 
[deleted]
thanks. Very weird, I just noticed my weekly/monthly is showing 7900 as the current price on TradingView. 7340 on the daily as expected. Look https://imgur.com/a/eZjNhKs
at least until the premiums come back

I mean if your strategy going in was holding then you need to hold on a longer timeframe. The only way holding as a investment strategy works is if you hold through the dips and shortterm movements and reap the long term average gains as the market grows.

If you go in with a strategy of holding and you sell in the first or second bearmarket then holding is not the strategy for you. People who hold and do it well hold shit for years. Has anything fundementally changed since you first invested?

If your strategy was trading then you can trade both directions so it shouldnt effect it. 

edit: included this cause it kind of explains where im coming from with my first point. Though I do hate Fast money.
https://twitter.com/CNBCFastMoney/status/1000124985288134663
How did you lose money as a long term holder?
Devil's advocate: you don't have any proof you'll never make positive returns :\)

You could always Tether for a break to come up with a strategy / timeframe you are comfortable with. Just because you sell once doesn't mean you can't buy back or invest in different projects.
I use them but it's not my entire basis for making a decision. Your flair says long term hole, so I assume you had faith in the long term viability of the tech as well. 
I'm hoping he has more than just that backing his belief...

Aw crap, I've got the hopium too.... damnit
Fair enough on the 50MA, but by the time that's happened you've missed out on half the bear market at least.  

As far as support, so what?  This is like the 50th support that has broken
Thanks! You can ask me for more facts any time. Beep boop.
idk bagholders gone baghold. 

yea, I'm expecting something like $3-5k. there's nothing barring it from sinking as low as $1-2k even.

if strict KYC/AML regulations are imposed it could kill most of the trading market and people would sell their coins.

if for example bitmex for whatever reason implements KYC/AML then the entire market is fucked because all of those coins are going to be sold.

And then maybe CME or something would see more volume where everything is cash settled- meaning no one has to buy actual in order to place your bets. 

Trading/gambling is half the reason bitcoin is still active/alive right now
So a higher price tag somehow makes market participants less susceptible to feeling emotions. Got it.
many low market cap shitcoins on polo, as well as a few larger ones such as eth and ripples, went through a huge bubble peaking in early June followed by a collective 70% to 95% crash and slow bleed during the months that followed e.g. digibyte went from 70 satoshi to 3k to 100. the alts didn't really pick up again until november or so, which i count as a separate bubble
“Fundsah Saefuh”
you know when this sub gets overly bearish or bullish its time to start making bets that the trend is going to reverse soon. this sub is ridiculous, bulls were frothing at the mouth last month when we were approaching 10k, bears were downvoted to oblivion. now trend is bear and whole sub is overly bearish and pessimistic. this whole sub is a circlejerk on the immediate trend and is a massive echochamber. 
wow that sub is literally all about nano. how bad is it.....

wow 1/9 of ATH...that's like $2200 for us
yea lol that makes sense
If you believe that Bitcoins price will be higher in the future (within a timeframe that you are happy to hold) then holding will work if that proves to be true.

However, i wouldn’t say holding is doing nothing. Holding a stack during large volatility (up or down) is very very difficult. It’s easy to fail at holding even if the price goes up 10x in the next year.
Supply and demand beg to differ, less supply for a certain demand increases the price.
Or lost it all.

The absolute confidence some people here have is astounding.  It's like you're part of some cult.
So they might even get the same 'panic-sell protection' that MtGox has benefited from. What a brilliant move!
i'm pretty certain that's not the case for banks (i think in my country the gov gets it back). but it'll depend on their status. are they custodial of the money or just an entertainment venue with crypto as game credit.

since they are in the US they are just, esentially, fucked. Them and their customers.
3 commas only
They aren't doing this for comic books or cell phones, but they are requiring all this regulation and invasion of privacy for digital tokens, because they cut into their action.  It's a War on Crypto and they are winning as I knew they would.  And the exchanges are complicit as accomplices at the very least and will benefit from all the seized tokens.  

it was probably a hedge short
Ah, thanks for clarifying that.
[deleted]
in sha’a llah
In something that is purely speculative, I'd say it's a decent indicator of data
In terms of looks?
Haven't paid much attention to it, but at least 40k for sure. 
That looks remarkably like the start of a crash pattern. Maybe ETH is the lagging indicator to BTC after all?
In other words: You just pulled that out of your a**, because the market acted in a way that you didn't understand.
What i am wondering is why would they dump so much now, after such a huge drop already. Panic that they missed the best point to sell? Pushing the market down to support their shorts? Seems like such a strange time point for a hidden wall..
A lot faster than RSS no? ;)
You can see for everyone but yourself :)
But you have one, i created 1 for the most subscribed users based on subscriptions till yesterday morning.
Maybe tomorrow i'll create the rest. It's a manual process so it takes more time. 
It's being pushed one way or another, I seriously doubt someone will buy the coins to push the price and then sell them again, just to drop it, it doesn't make no sense!
What did I do? Speak my mind?
Disclaimer, I am not short.

I don't disagree that when this gets bullish, things will change. But my thoughts are that we either need a v shape recovery with news that creates a full bull or a long term flat, boring price for a bit, then bullish news, then recovery. Agree? 


2013 bitcoiners: the killer app is around the corner, bitcoin will scale to infinity!

2018 bitcoiners: bitcoin doesn't need to scale, mainstream applications are parasites!
Because bitcoin is still in adaption phase?
Why would I be wrong? I'm arguing that people don't reflect on time as much as they should and everyone zooms in and out according to their desires, making most charts on this sub practically pointless. And I've yet to see anyone seriously use any really statistics. In fact, when people start turning to statistics, perhaps I'll start paying attention a bit more. Until then, most of these gifs and jpgs are not far removed from astrological columns. 
it does not. you lose capital every time the price goes down

sunk cost fallacy
miners don’t sell coins. they enter forward contracts for the enrgy and physical resources. They pay workers in BTC. They don’t put sel pressure anywhere. If anything, maybe the people who are on the other end of the poop stick may sell.

Miners I know don’t sell very many BTC

Also, the utility companies that provide electricity to the miners do not pay for that energy either... no one does. At least in China all the enrgy used for mining is overproduced and would just get lost in the grid moving from transistor to capacitor ad nauseum.

Miners and the entire mining ecosystem put very little sell pressure on the market afaik
If a 95% correction is ridiculous, what do you call the bull run of 2017? It works both ways guy. And I am not a permabear. I was calling for BTC to be over 10k beginning of last year due to the bubble characteristics I was witnessing and people had the same reactions as you are having right now. Get your perspectives in order.
I may wait a little since I’ve already got quite some exposure, but may start opening heavy longs with my existing stack instead of mobilizing fiat
> People said the same thing about if it ever went below 10k..How'd that work out? 

It caused 11.7 double top.
People loaded up like crazy at 200. I know I did. That was like ~87% off ATH. We slow bled to 200 over a year and wicked down to 159-ish and sub 200 was never seen again. We were at 400 six months later. Surely someone or something got us there.

Look at the 2011 bubble. liquidity picked up a couple months after the bubble popped.

People loaded up like crazy at 450, 750, 1750, 3k, 5.5k. Don’t be naiv.

If we do go sub 1k, you can say “I told you so”

Until then, this is a shitpost
That's not entirely true. I bought up on the final drop from 3k to 1.8k as well as the drop from 5k to 3k.

So saying people won't buy is wrong. 
You sounded like Bittrex locked up your fund because you are not verified. So why can't you verify now to withdraw?
You did't say much about if you do the verification at all?
> nobody expected them to suddenly make funds completely unwithdrawable

Of course some people expected it.  I had assumed they had already done it.  Bittrex did this months ago.
Yes, you're right.

I take it back. Looks like a considerable change from their announcements up until now.

I got verified \(only exchange I'm verified with\), but would be totally pissed if I hadn't.
Everyone got an email saying this would happen Q1 2018 for "legacy" accounts
[deleted]
the amount of total nonamers vindicating regilars in this sub is really annoying.
Says the guy who posted [THIS SHIT?](https://imgur.com/a/39r2vRd)  You think you can threaten to dox people and it will all be ok?  I was going to report you to the admins, but didn't.  So you think your actions on Reddit have no repercussions?  You can threaten to dox, and then try to turn it around on them?  I asked you a legitimate question...WHY DID YOU DELETE THE POSTS THREATENING TO DOX ME?  You know why?  Because you know you were wrong, and you knew it was a bannable offense so you are trying to cover your ass.  So yeah, I'm going to post and let people just exactly what type of person they are dealing with.  If you can't handle that, maybe you shouldn't threaten people.

PS:  Tagging people in RES isn't a bannable offense.   
> So they are shills and they should be banned, but you, sitting here literally all day and night talking shit about bitcoin cash, is okay? You shouldn’t be banned?

First of all, I'm not talking about BCash, I'm talking about BCash shills brigading this sub. 

Second of all, when I do criticize BCash, which is almost always exclusively in response to BCash shills pushing a false narrative, there's nothing wrong with that. I'm not a shill and **this is not a BCash subreddit. Get that through you're head.** You and your gang of BCash shills telling every lie in the book **do not belong in this sub**. And *if* you do belong, you belong in the alt thread. 

>How about you stop mentioning Bitcoin Cash altogether? 

I'm only mentioning it because of the issue this sub has with shills, like I already said. 

> Then you won’t get any down votes you need to create conspiracy theories around.

What conspiracy theories. There are a handful of BCash regulars that covertly shill in this sub, that's not a theory that's just a fact.

>And you won’t get any replies that upset your mental stability.

Lol, yeah I'm *so* upset right now. I'm crying in fact. Oh gosh! Why are BCashers so mean! 

>And nobody has to get banned. Including you.

Shills *should* get banned, duh! Look at the sidebar FFS.

edit: also, my post ended up well in the green. Imagine that. It's almost like BCash shills downvote brigaded me as soon as I posted but then legitimate users here came through with the upvotes because they know that this shilling and brigading is annoying af.
This is a Bitcoin Markets forum, to talk about trading and market movements. Any posts about Satoshi's vision or any technical crap should be removed immediately anyway unless it's directly affecting a market movement. There are other subs to talk about fundamentals on.
Lol at you
How much it costs to pay someone is important. If bitcoin really is suppose to be a p2p currency
Actually its pretty neutral from someone that holds neither and is short lol enjoy your bags
I think he's playing dead right now, while the bears are sniffing around.
Thats why it should fall to below 4k. We could learn much more
dats cool
I think him and Stokinator are possibly the same person lol
What is a BRD?
I do agree about shorting , I think the bottom is near but what the fuck do I know 
I remember telling my partner that if segwit activated, we could see $2500 by December 2017. 
She joked about it going to $10,000 and I told her not to be stupid.
I've only owned Bitcoin since Oct 2018 but I was aware of it way back in the day when it first became somewhat known (I had a friend using an xbox to mine for coins). I've been only really actively "trading" for a couple months, with that activity greatly increased in the last month.
roger that
bullish or not, looks like this line makes people think
It's up since early February when we hit $6000.  Looks like $7200 is the third higher low.  Epics are long.  It's going to be a long, painful recking for the shorties.  Will be fun to watch.  It's hilarious when people around here get all silly about these little fire sales because you just know that the majority of them are jealous no-coiners rooting for the impossible.  I'm actually really, really, enjoying this accumulation period, much more so than 2014.  That wasn't fun.  This is.  
The smart ones have been shorting from 10k. 
Actually studies have found that males do have a higher mean IQ than females, but it isn't that huge of a difference and would not account for the disparity of men vs women in crypto.  And of course this is averages and you could very well be much smarter than me and wouldn't change the rest of humanity.

Maybe you are right about the testosterone thing.  I have a female friend who is into crypto and she is definitely not the "girly girl" type and is more dominant and aggressive than most women.

Also I would guess that men are more often to be degenerate compulsive gamblers than women are, so crypto is more attractive to them for this reason as well.


[removed]
Binance charges me 0.05% per transaction, so in case of only one entry, one exit, it's 0.1% for a trade. Compared to 1% loss due to a mistake, I'd take five unnecessary stops triggered before that 1% that could have been avoided. Edit: But my stops don't actually get triggered often. I want to use stops more actively, but using a trading style that is probably different from what I assume you are using. In my perspective, a 1% increase per day is very good. As such, probably different from day trading.
And bulls made more in the 5 weeks before that. What's your point?
Delusion is denying and downvoting simple facts when they don't conform to your trading narrative of choice friend.
That's what I was thinking of!  Thanks
The fee is split between the consumer and the producer based on the elasticity of each curve. The consumer paying 100% of a merchant fee only happens if demand is fully inelastic or supply is fully elastic. 
here here
lol he trolling tho
Lol, "in this market"? You mean the market where we just closed below the 50 week MA for the first time since the 2014 bear market? You mean *that* market? The reason we got a BGD in April was because shorts were at an ATH and there was room for relief (plus lots of people talking about A&E double bottom). Now what's the excuse for make a big green dildo? There's more resistance overhead and every pump has little to no follow through. 

It's amazing that you're *this* bullish, given the current environment. I'd say the bear market is just about to enter its second act. 
Chances are good. The average may continue to move up to close to 10K before turning downwards, so there will be a good amount of headroom to bounce without crossing back over.
Your weekly/monthly what? The ticker price should be the same no matter which time frame you're on. The 50 week MA is currently at 7610 on Bitfinex. It'll probably be about 7700 once the next candle opens in about 10 minutes.
If anything fundamentally changes bitcoin is going to be either at $0 faster than he can blink, or bear market will end
[deleted]
Eh, you know what I meant. My portfolio has lost $1,000.
"You could always Tether"

Why people are still viewing Tether as a safe haven is beyond me, if you fire an auditor it usually signals something very wrong will be uncovered.  Of course that might not be the case, but it's very rare to take that course of action.
We all want it to go up but the fundamentals are against it :( it only goes up when all hopium is lost.
https://www.tradingview.com/x/3M4JEQcI/

The log down trend from 20k we broke out of is now right below us. The bottom trend line on the lows is still below that and a lot of btc was bought at 6800-6900 the cause the short squeeze last time. I think it'll take some effort to get us below 7k and a pop is more likely. But yeah if we do break this area I'm out, but not before.

Edit, I didn't downvote you btw not sure who or why someone did.

And here is the daily of the same chart zoomed in. https://www.tradingview.com/x/D75t0YCJ/
I would like to stay above 7k before jumping ship, and close tomorrow above 7600. If those don't hold I'll bail.
What types of bulls are there?
Yeah KYC locks up a lot of coins.
The whole no KYC when you deposit but KYC when you withdraw is a blatant way to trap coins.

They will lend out those coins at even 5-10% a year and it's gravy for them.

The two most bullish cases for btc is the gambling /trading and the "digital gold". 

The former is actually very powerful but price can be 1k without affecting number of traders. 

The digital gold case looks less trust worthy if it falls 95% (for even some percentage of the population who bought at 20k). 


haha

Ok do you stay short on june or september to avoid funding for this type of long dated trade?
I'm reading about coins getting stuck indefinitely, because people fail KYC or refuse to do it.  I'm wondering what happens to those coins?   It's kind of an enforced hodling.

There's no way to liquidate into cash without doing KYC, so it would seem selling is pointless anyway.

The psychology of a bagholder is that their losing investment becomes a *long term investment* 
higher price tag means the market has changed, there is a reason why it reaches that price, people felt it is justified to pay 20k for Bitcoin instead of 2 bucks. Infrastructure, exposure, utilization... Market changes when these change. market fundementals leads to consensus of participants of a certain minimal valuation of the price. Fundementals change, price consensus changes.
whole sub was bullish for 2017, the only reason you think this is true is because we've been ranging for the past few months. there will be a big move up or down here soon and one side will get rekt and the contrarian traders will just stfu 

anyway this sub is smarter than the general market: https://twitter.com/PeterLBrandt/status/1000738424461058050

crypto twitter is still more bullish than bearish. june back to $15 premium and sep at $90 premium...at 37% ATH...and you're telling me we ain't bullish lol
If you base your trading strategy on reddit comments, prepare to get utterly rekt.
But technology bro 
literally zero posts about nano there
Doing nothing is not about holding being difficult or not. I am talking about not generating any value. 
You are wrongly assuming that decreased supply from the holders can triumpth over selling pressure from traders, which is not the case as we have seen in the past. Secondly, if everyone is holding bitcoin is not being used as a currency, which means its not fulfilling at least half of its purpose. There is no reason to think demand is constant or increasing while supply is decreasing. 

You can't just throw "lol supply and demand" wihout any context.
Yet we've seen a surplus of supply and a lack of demand for the past 5 months...which doesn't have to end
supply increases every day 
Imagine you have 600k on this exchange. Whatcha wanna do - withdraw 24 x 25k? That's a joke
isn't that uno comma?
Can an airplane full of miners melt steal beams though?
Gotcha
It's just what happens after parabolas.
I've been calling for a dump for weeks. so I understood it just fine. 

its just a very interesting coincidence 
You want my bearish perspective? I think Bitcoin isn't done dumping. Longs still greatly outnumber shorts, so there aren't a lot of buyers left to "buy the dip". We recovered from the dump to $7250 slightly, but the dropping could easily continue after the weekend if we don't break through any major resistance levels by then. During this period, the ETH/BTC ratio has managed to bounce back all the way to where it was when BTC was $8000. In addition, on the 2hr, the second bounce formed a lower high, indicating there isn't much upside left on the bounce.

I doubt this is a single actor trying to sell ETH. I know if I held the perspective above, I would be trying to sell here on the bounce. On top of that, people could be shorting ETH waiting for the ratio to drop (not sure which exchange you're looking at). Couple that with the fact that nobody can honestly say they expected it to dump this hard and fast without any sizeable bounces, this may be the first opportunity to not panic sell this week. Not everyone can predict the top and unload all their bags there. It's the same reason people are selling Bitcoin here when they could have sold at $10k.

So that's my bearish perspective. What are your thoughts from the bullish side?
True that :) I guess I’m just a bit old school ;)
Still there should be a list somewhere on the site.

And when you send help to the bot it would be nice to attach link to the site somewhere there.

This gets nicer day by day, I just wish more people pay attention to their positions there. I think couple positions are already closed, like /u/mikexbt and /u/sloppysynapses
If they are wash trading and most of the buys actually hit sell orders of their own, then their loss on the pump is minimal. And then they dump on the plebe.  There is a lot of manipulation on crypto markets. You just have to admit it and trade by taking this in consideration.
See it's not as straightforward as that.

In a perfect world, you would maximise profit by going long and by going short, with leverage. You could make a hell of a lot of profit this way, just moving the price up and down within a $100 range, if you could time it right.
huh? no I'm saying you realize the push to $11.7k and $10k were exactly what you just described 
It is bullish already that's the secret.  It only looks bearish.
bitcoin is the killer app.
[deleted]
As far as I know, a lot of miners separate holding from mining operations and turn everything they mine into liquid assets as soon as possible. Maybe they can cover some expenses in straight BTC, but mostly this means they sell for FIAT. Too risky otherwise. 
The bull run of 2017 had precedent. It happened in 2013 (twice) 10 to 200 and ~100 to 1300-ish

It happened in 2011 and in 2012 as far as I can remember

The correction you speak or has 0 precedent outside of some freak crash in 2011 that was largely due to someone with a shitton of stolen coins crashing the market
There never was a bubble. Bubbles pop fast and go to zero, not $7500 where we were six months ago (and when, incidentally, people were screaming "bubble!" as they have for going on nine years now). It was wrong to call it a bubble at $50, wrong at $1000, wrong in December and certainly wrong now. If you think we're going sub-1k, you have no concept of how this market works.
I'm out right now, waiting for a long period of low violtility ot capitulation, whatever comes first. 
At 200? 1000? No they didn't. Only smart folks who had a lot of BTC history did. "People" as in the wider audience that got into bitcoin late last year after 5k, 10k, will never have the insight, need or wish to get into bitcoin when it would be 2K or even less. That will be the time where all the mainstream media will be on repeat mode with" BTC is dead". I'm pretty sure that even half the holders here who swear to get in lower will shy away when it's actually that low.

Only way the general audience will come back, is when BTC goes near or over ATH again.
I would have bought that drop from 5k to 3k, but I was in the can without my phone when the reversal became clear, and by the time I noticed, it was too late.
I could most likely get my funds back if I sent them DNA sample, passport/license, and whatever else they ask for.
Are you saying they’re calling out regulars for poor behavior or not calling them out?
The amount of well knowns NOT calling out regulars for shitty behavior is what is really annoying 
newsflash, I caught a 3 day sitewide ban for that and I'm fairly sure it was you who reported me...so I served my time, yet here you are again still harassing me.

and I didn't delete them, the admins/mods did 

and no tagging people in RES isn't a bannable offense, but telling people to tag others so they can harass them later is. Just like it is a bannable offense to harass me a week later in a completely different thread, where you are also breaking the rule by posting offtopic content 
>  I was going to report you to the admins, but didn't

?????.  Why would you whine about someone threatening to dox you in a public form and not even bother to report their post to the mods?   It makes your argument suspect.


Sorry I didn’t even read all of that. It’s late. You should get some sleep. Stop talking about BCH. You might get yourself banned as per your own suggestion.
I disagree with that. Fundamental analysis and tech developments always relate to price and should be welcome here. So long as it relates to Bitcoin and Bitcoin trading.
who cares if you gotta pay a 10$ fee when buying your lambo

"Pretty neutral"? How is it neutral to call a coin that has far worse metrics on every account "better"? 

This is the blatant covert shilling I've seen. 
4k and under is extremely pessimistic. the downturn would have to get as bad as 2014-2015. i dont think it'll get that bad. 
Echo chamber city. 
Big red dildo
I think you meant Oct. 2017, lol. Sounds like your friend got into Bitcoin really early. When I got into it, you pretty much had to mine with a
 GPU. Man, have times changed. Now, I think that you have a healthy bearish outlook of the market right now. The regulatory news, IMO, has really taken the wind out of the bulls and given the bears the upper hand...for the moment. If you're going to be day trading throughout this bear market, I'd be watching for any rumors or moves by the US government regarding oversight of BTC. There is a floor for BTC, despite what some say, and my belief is that it's the price at which it is no longer profitable to mine BTC. Others may disagree.
hahha im jk mate
It certainly has me thinking, and while the touches are few (I count 4), they are important swing high and swing low touches. So with that in mind, we are approaching this line, and I'm keen to see what the majority thinks about it.
and what will you say if/when we go below $6k? 
Exactly, that was a good time to short. But would you recommend shorting now? 
The smart ones sold at $19k and above $10k later on.
[removed]
You don’t think people who open shorts have the ability to open longs when they see fit? L O L
You were questioning whether shorts could make more profits than longs in a price downturn no? His conclusion was far from strange. Anyone who has held a long from $10\-20k has lost money/BTC. Anyone who has shorted from $10\-20k has made money/BTC. Simple. Anyway his comment has been deleted now so what does it matter.
Again if it actually gets below that it’s one thing...but it hasn’t yet

And I think we can both agree that this stuff is very manipulated

So now would be right around the time to do the opposite of what everyone is expecting and pump 
Yeah I mean alt coins are very risky on the way down imo. You never quite know what will actually come back up again if we do truely go for a deep bear run. You might wanna lower your risk. And imo there is nothing wrong with moving slightly out of the market if you have reason to think we are going down. 

If you do go into trading you have to stop the mentality of thinking of your starting point (it will always be there but try to ignore it). If you are holding a losing hand there is no point in continuing to bid to see the river. Your money is the money you have now. Your stack is worth what its worth now. 

Fear of realizing your losses/pretending that if you just never sell you have never lost anything is quite dangerous. You should be looking at the investment asking if its a good investment to be in at the current price level with current market conditions. If no then not selling just because it technically makes your losses more real to you psychologically is not the correct move imo. 

That being said dont FUD yourself out of good projects that you truely think will do well long term cause of this post or a short term drop in BTC.
Everyone’s altcoins are very good.

Dropped mine and went full BTC. Alts jump nice but fall hard.
Well it's not necessarily going to happen but if it did it'd probably be disastrous. You might be waiting forever lol
Hm, I have no idea what kind of implications that'd have. I guess a decrease in supply is bullish
So there was a higher price tag in 2014 than in 2011. The market changed then, so why did it need to fall 85% from the high? Fundamentally, Bitcoin was okay but lots of civil war in 2014. Segwit and LN were both being worked on back then.

The fundamentals are important for the long-term uptrend. Its the reason Bitcoin bottoms higher than before instead of just going back to $1 after every bubble. It doesn't mean Bitcoin doesn't have prolonged downward movement.
The only thing mcap changed is that now you have a couple more holders which is why price is 7k and not $500. That is literally it, nothing else. There is less interest in Bitcoin now than there was in 2013.
no i definitely agree this sub is much more insightful and has genuine intelligent discussions vs twitter and /r/cc. mainstream crypto mediums are fucking absolute cancer. it blows my mind how dumb the majority of people in this space are. 

thats why i think this sub is a huge pre-mature circlejerk. market from a macro perspective is at a major crossroads and depending on where it goes in the next month will really determine what the next year or so will be like. i agree that we're on the verge of either continuing the bull trend of 2017 or firmly breaking log support and log support becomes resistance just like it did in post 2013. i just think its too premature to know where this market will go and both sides have merit in their arguments.
yeah man because i was being 100% literal with that comment, thanks for the sage advice.
look at the daily friendo

ctrl+f "nano"

28
Ah, I see.

However, removing coins from the market is increasing the value of the remaining coins.

Essentially that's what happened during the run\-up to 20k: "A shit ton of people bought expecting to get rich" by holding coins and not selling them.

The drop happened when the temptation to sell was too great and people stopped holding.
This is a fair point.

As you say: it comes down to demand.

Holding works if there is increased \(or at least constant\) demand for Bitcoin, but not if there is reduced demand.

At this moment in time we have reduced demand.
If you have 600K on the exchange you would probably want to get Enhanced Verification.  Otherwise you can withdraw $25K daily, although I wouldn't be surprised if they forced you into Enhanced Verification at that point.  The writing has been on the wall for awhile with Poloniex.  If you expected to trade unverified with a 6 digit balance on there after they were acquired by Circle you were delusional.
I do not have any bullish perspective at the moment (except for maybe a bull div on the 4h, lol), thats why i am nearly constantly hedging. But i believe in btc in the long term, thats why i hate losing btc, even it's just via a hedge short. Thanks for your perspective, i have to say i agree.
I closed mine and fixed it
I'll probably add the link to each of the  users history page. I believe if we leave these no trade zones that people will start using it more.
Nowadays entering a position is pure gamble. 
But they are buying more coins just to dump what they already have? No. I admit the manipulation very well, but I do not agree with these strategies, these are not money makers.
Sorry but we are not talking of a perfect world, are we?!
Dude, I wasn't even in this sub on the leg up to $11.7k. I only joined this I think when we bottomed last time in the $6.5k range. 

But afterwards, from the start of the leg up to $10k, I was here, however, I didn't knew all this time that I could actually contribute to the push, I just found out. haha.
Small miners yes, big miners no.

Google forward contract.

Bitmain & Co are holding (probably) millions of BTC and they enter forward contracts for energy in exchange for a portion of the mining reqards.

Like I said, the energy is free for anyone involved.

At most, they may pay for things like internet bandwidth, insurance, building the housing for the mining equipment in fiat.
Bubbles go to zero? 
So the housing bubble popped and we had free homes?
Oil bubble popped and we had free oil?
Gold/Silver bubble popped and we had free metals?
Agri bubble popped and we had free veggies?
I don't think "you" have a concept how markets work...sorry
*slow clap*
No, plenty of people accumlated at 200. Sure it was smart money, but something got us from 150 to 1000 from 2015-2016
Lol
So why don't you give them what they need? Its obviously not much money.
>and I didn't delete them, the admins/mods did

I WONDER FUCKING WHY...Here's the deal...you are not a good person.  You threatened me, posted what you thought was my current vehicle to try to scare me like some kind of real world stalker, and now you think because I'm calling you out and your terrible behavior that I'm the bad guy?  That's some next level red pill bullshit my man. 

Here's the deal, you apologize for your threats that got you a site-wide ban and I'll believe you learned your lesson.  If not, I'll keep posting to tell people exactly what type of person you are so that they don't receive the same treatment.  Deal?
Oh yeah, sorry. I forgot your reading speed and comprehension are severely limited. I'll do an ELI4 for you next time.
News may come out that affects the price (though in recent experience, the market doesn't give a shit about good news, only FUD). But how many times can we have the 'bigger blocks are better' debate on a daily trading thread?
Stop covert shilling. It's obnoxious af.
[deleted]
Well when I use bitcoin in real fucking life. To gamble or buy drugs which is really an ACTUAL  FUCKING USE BESIDES SPECULATION its the better option because its cheaper to send. Understand?
Because bulls snort too much hopium. And practically btc has no use. Just gamble. Until we replace gold. The price wont move. And it takes time.
[deleted]
Nobody asked that except you. I would absolutely recommend opening a short over a long. However right now I wouldn't recommend anything, as I am waiting for the market to decide its next move.
[removed]
[removed]
[deleted]
No genius. Anyone can trade either way. And there have been as many opportunities to go long as to go short.
My questioning was on his inability to zoom out:

Yes price dropped 80% from 20k. But it had risen 180% from 7k in the same time period before.

Dropped 43% from March's high of 11.5k, after having risen 75% from 6k bottom in Feb.

Dropped 30% form the 10k high in May, but it had risen over 50% from April's 6.5k.
>Again if it actually gets below that it’s one thing...but it hasn’t yet

Yes it has. It just closed below for the first time since 2015. That is really not a great sign. 

>And I think we can both agree that this stuff is very manipulated

I guess. Not really sure to what extent and that really doesn't matter for longer term trends, imo. 

>So now would be right around the time to do the opposite of what everyone is expecting and pump


No, that's flawed logic. Lots of people here are still bullish and think we're about to get a BGD. Just look at all the comments of people opening up fresh longs. The shorts are not that high, nowhere near where they were in early April. The fuel is not there for a big squeeze. Every small pump is being immediately abandoned by buyers.

Again, it's amazing that you think this is more likely to go significantly *up* at this point instead of significantly down.
Long term its bullish but I think short term it's not.  Those bitcoins are usually leveraged on exchanges, and off exchanges, they aren't.  Then again a lot of the leverage goes into shorting btc and longing altcoin pairs (or usdt)

Whales hiding coins into cold storage are going to choose bitcoin.  It might be neutral for bitcoin and bearish for altcoins.  No whale is going to hold his entire alt portfolio in 20 different cold wallets.




You're comparing a 10 billion dollar market with a 400 billion dollar market. 2012 this was not a market, it was a dealership in your back alley. 2014 saw this evolve into something you could begin to call a market. Now it is maturing rapidly. Not only Bitcoin but the whole market as a whole. Ethereum success was a turning point that show blockchain was capable of doing something other than currency. We've been past two crashes from the abominable price of 2017. Market is beginning to consolidate in these prices and it will grow from here, but not all of it. Shitcoins are being purged and this is good.
That is a vast underestimation. We have big names entering the market and opening trading desks, alts are creating large enterprise focused network. You're either making heavily biased assumptions or don't believe in this market. Both makes your opinion pointless.
that's fair. I can see it happening based solely on a few technicals but for me the technicals and fundamentals look pretty bearish. who knows though, 2014 had a massive bulltrap in the summer so maybe we'll see the same thing
I never used Poloniex, but I am opposed to verifying my identity. Those companies stay anonymous; why shouldn't I?
Just saying I could easily be wrong. I mean, shorting ETH has not been nearly as profitable for me the past few days as shorting BTC, and this ratio could hold even if BTC continues to drop. I just wanted to share another perspective.
slowly accumulate on low volume, pump using wash trading, slowly dump on plebe (aka the bart) 
Zzzzzzzzzz........
funny, I was thinking the same exact thing about you when you started calling for harassing of other users sitewide just because they disagreed with you politically, and I sure as shit thinking it now when you continue to harass me a week later after a mediocre argument 

but see the difference is that I already served my time for breaking the ToS and haven't even thought about you for a week. You on the other hand seem to have gotten mentally unhinged and continue to stalk and harass me a week later, which is also against the ToS.

Just like its against the rules of this sub to post offtopic stuff. We are here to discuss bitcoin trading, not for you to harass me. So how about you let it go and wait for the admins to decide on what to do with you, and the rest of us can go back to making some money? Surely you have better things to do with your life on memorial weekend than continuing to harass me?
Can you guys do this in PM's in future, or a sub thats not this one?

Yeah that's my point. The BCash vs Bitcoin debate doesn't belong here but shills love to sneak it into every conversation. It's shilling and should result in bans.
Just fork the word neutral to mean something else. Fuck those neutral core shills. Lol
It only costs pennies to send either. Also, Bitcoin has much stronger security, much better liquidity and holds it value better. 

So, no, I *don't* understand. The only thing I understand is that you're a BCash shill who's pretending to be "neutral". You're not fooling anyone, bro. 
lol okay buddy. so we're just going to replace gold as a store of value over night and price will shoot to 1 million in minutes? you do know this process is gradual, as more and more people value BTC as a store of value, as a hedge against certain market movements, as a way of transferring wealth internationally more efficiently, securely, and cheaper than traditional systems, as a way of decentralized currency (we'll get there), it'll gradually rise in price. adoption doesn't happen over night so your argument is moot. 

wait until hedge funds and ETFs start offering crypto as a high-risk/high-reward asset. eventually 401ks and other retirement schemes will offer BTC and other cryptos as options. adoption is coming, it just takes time. 

4k may happen in fact it wouldnt surprise me since itd be similar to what happened last bullrun, we went from 1k to ~200 at its lowest which is a 80% correction, similarly 20k to 4k would be of the same magnitude. however, thats really pessimistic imo as conditions are vastly different and the market has much more liquidity and adoption. 
And everyone is sure of it and bearish statements get all the upvotes these days.  You know what comes next when everyone thinks the same thing is happening.
[removed]
My bad, didn't realise "lately" means precisely 3 weeks or less. So obvious. /s
If it gets below 6,900 I’ll reconsider. Until then I’m betting on it going up and painting a higher low that the bulls need to keep the normies buying 
Wallstreet is literally where Bitcoin grew up. There were big names in it for many years. 

Alts are alts. They're worthless until they're not. Bring them up when they're generating profits.
yeah correct.
> started calling for harassing of other users sitewide just because they disagreed with you politically

TIL Tagging people in RES is calling for site-wide harrassment.  It's almost like people should have some kind of responsibility or accountability for what they say online huh?  It's almost like RES provides that EXACT SERVICE.  Maybe you redirect your malice towards the people who allow unscrupulous people like me to use their evil service, eh?  That reddit deep state. 

Apologize and I'll leave you alone.  You obviously didn't learn anything from your site-wide ban though, so I'm inclined to keep having this conversation until you do. 
No, I prefer the public record so others can see exactly what type of person is posting in these subs.  You wanna be doxxed and threatened for your bitcoin wallet? 
Oh stop.  You already admitted you are just anti-BCH because you have a personal vendetta against Roger. Ever since you said that, I view all of your comments in that light.
I could care less about the value over time since I dont hold it. If I want to spend bitcoin to circument government regulation I buy and spend it. And for my purposes bch is the superior fork. Better liquidity ok my purchases arent gigantic i dont care. Stronger security?..havent seen a problem with a 51% attack or whatever your talking about. Hold value better?...dont care for reasons i said but lets not act like bitcoin holds value either

Do you even use bitcoin?
Uhhhh thats why i write it takes time buddy. More than a decade. Possibly until all gold holders are dead. Dont be absurd. It wont be overnite. Are you high on hopium?
[removed]
So you acknowledge that we're below the 50 week now but don't see that as foreboding? What exactly is making you bullish besides wishful thinking?
This market is all connected. Bitcoin leads the crash and dumps, last time alts pumping preceded Bitcoin going up. Sometimes eth leads the way. Now the interest in this market is not from the dumb money that were flushed during the two previous crashes, but big investors that must accumulate before anything major happens. When most of the coins are concentrated in few wallets, one can only wonder where this thing is going. And alts generate more profit, they are more risky and not suitable for those with million+ investment. But I see alts closer to adoption than bitcoin ever was. Too much manipulation is rendering bitcoin useless both as a currency and a store of value, its two supposed use cases. 
> TIL Tagging people in RES is calling for site-wide harrassment. 

Tagging alone? No. Telling others to tag them in RES so you can all harass them across different reddits as a group is called brigading and is against the ToS...especially since you were planning to do it over someone's political beliefs. The fact that you don't realize how much of a fascist that makes you, is funny in itself. 

> Apologize and I'll leave you alone. You obviously didn't learn anything from your site-wide ban though, so I'm inclined to keep having this conversation until you do.

So here we have extortion, and you saying that you intent to continue harassing me indefinitely until you are stopped. Hrm, I'm sure the admins will enjoy reading that comment too.

And you might be inclined to continue beating a dead horse, but you'll have to continue having this conversation with yourself. I'll no longer reply to you. 
How about you stfu and stop whining 
[deleted]
>You already admitted you are just anti-BCH because you have a personal vendetta against Roger.

Lol, what? I said no such thing. I've never met or interacted with Roger in any way. 

Nice try though!

>Ever since you said that, I view all of your comments in that light.

Said *what*? As I just reiterated, I hold no personal vendetta against the guy, I merely criticize his behavior with regard to marketing BCash under the Bitcoin brand, which is fraudulent. 

What exactly is the issue with doing so?  
> Hold value better?...dont care for reasons i said but lets not act like bitcoin holds value either

You're wrong. Bitcoin liquidity and value are important for both sender and receiver because of spread and volatility. You cannot avoid these effects even if each party is holding the coin for the minimal amount of time required to trade and exchange. You can't escape these effects, which will be absorbed by one or both parties. 

>Do you even use bitcoin?

Yes.
>havent seen a problem with a 51% attack or whatever your talking about.

Wow. Still hard to imagine there are actually people this ignorant. BCH has an incredibly small hashpower/USD cost to attack, but you think that's fine because nobody has done it yet? Verge and Bitcoin Gold getting millions stolen last week was just the warm up.
Kick the drugs and beat it, kid. 
I highly doubt that anyone who uses Bitcoin core can really be that naive to the facts of usage. Or lack thereof. 

It's going to be in the history books, all of this will, except those history books will be on the immutable chain of Bitcoin on Memo.cash or Blockpress.com.
lol no it wont take more than a decade. BTC will start eating market share much much sooner than that. a lot of people think so too. yeah im not going to seriously consider anyone's argument that spell night as nite unironically. you're just as high on pessium as much as any other perma bull on hopium. 
[removed]
the 1 day chart 

as long as this doesn't go below $6,800-6,900 I'm bullish that we'll see a higher low around here 
>Telling others to tag them in RES so you can all harass them across different reddits as a group is called brigading and is against the ToS.

Funny that someone from the cult "personal responsibility" doesn't see the irony here.  Here's how to avoid the issue of being tagged in RES:  Don't be a fucking asshole.  I'm an asshole at times, feel free to tag me as such. You won't see me bitching and whining about it because I actually have a sense of responsibility. 

>So here we have extortion, and you saying that you intent to continue harassing me indefinitely until you are stopped. Hrm, I'm sure the admins will enjoy reading that comment too.

No man, I'm protecting the people in the subs you post in because you are a predator.  You doxxed me, posted what you thought were relevant facts about my life to scare me into being silent.  What's going to stop you from doing the same thing to people here in a subreddit that is dedicated to virtual currency?  You going to threaten someone here and take their cash?  You are a bad person who obviously doesn't feel bad about doxxing people on the internet.  
You gonna feel the same way when he doxxes you?  I'm trying to protect your ass.  
Tupac cares, if don't nobody else care.
You’re obsessed.   Go to bed.  
Ive used my real life experiences to conclude bch is the better fork. I dont know why I am being asking me to defend every aspect of bch. Maybe you should  since its essentially the exact same as btc and shares the same weaknesses. Every argument of better liquidity or hashpower are not protocol related fucking arguments. Those things are not guaranteed to always be
The fact that btc dogmatics are so mad that anyone dare point out that bitcoin cash does a better job at bitcoins ONLY FUNCTION. Sheesh. You haters are the shills
Lol, right the coin that's continuously losing ground to Bitcoin in price, volume and everything else under the sun is going to supplant Bitcoin. Yeah, *I'm sure that's going to happen*.
Good luck with that, but I am betting against this post ageing well.
wahahah i purposely write night as nite to see whether your useless high hopium is right. anddd apparently right. have any other point besides spelling?

oh easy why it wont be sooner. 
1. we just passed first bull 20k btc.
2. regulations is still in progress.
3. Blockchain still no real usage besides you know hopium :)
4. we are poor generations. old one is rich. anddd they rather like gold noww. anddd they are not familiar with all tech now :)
but still i will be happy if it can be faster. but nahhh im not on perma bull hopium like all your previous arguments/opinions that focus on spelling.
But why? Why are you expecting that to happen instead of just a short term bounce and then falling through. What you're saying sounds like wishful thinking, especially given that so many other metrics look bad, most recently the 50 week MA. I don't know how you can ignore the significance of that.
We'll that was a roller coaster of comments. Still not sure whos in the right here. Gonna need yall to keep arguing 
He wouldn’t be inclined to dox me because I’m not being an asshole. 
No, like I just said, I'm *not* obsessed, certainly not with Roger. You just made that whole little story up because that's what you shills do best. Pull together a narrative based on lies and try to propagate it through various crypto subs. It's pathetic but I guess that's really the only shot you guys have at pumping the price. 

Also, it's not bed time for *me*, so thank you but no.
? 

You must be thinking of Bitcoin gold, Bitcoin diamond, Bitcoin private and the plethora of Bitcoin forks which were out to seek money or try dilute the value of Bitcoin cash. 

There's good reason why Bitcoin cash is on core's incompetent heels. Give it time and the machine will draw to a halt. 

There's also good reason why it's only Bitcoin cash that gets this type of flack from Bitcoin core, because it's a real contender that worries you. 

See you on the flip side, cupcake. 
Bcore
Don't be surprised if I'm the one reminding you. 😂
youre an absolute moron, im done talking to you.
Because this isn’t my first rodeo and there is this tendency with bitcoin to do the opposite of what the charts are saying and a few % points is a small risk to take to see if it plays out like I expect it to 

Plus the bears have been gloating too much lately, and anytime that happens whether it’s the bears or the bulls that’s about the time that a sudden reversal happens 
WHo's in the right?  He doxxed me and threatened to release my info because I tagged a guy as  "Trumptard" in Reddit Enhancement Suite.  Did I dox the trumptard?  Did I dox him?  Did I get a site-wide ban?  Nope.
I didn't know being an asshole was against the TOS of Reddit.  Man, the internet is in trouble...
> You must be thinking of Bitcoin gold, Bitcoin diamond, Bitcoin private and the plethora of Bitcoin forks which were out to seek money or try dilute the value of Bitcoin cash.

Nope, I'm thinking of *any and all contentious forks*. Bitcoin is a singular consensus network. All copies and impostors are referred to as **alts**.

>There's good reason why Bitcoin cash is on core's incompetent heels. Give it time and the machine will draw to a halt.

My point is that it's not. BCash is processing the same number of transactions as 2012 Bitcoin. **It's gone back 6 years in time**. It's amazing that that looks healthy to you. 

Segwit is processing more transactions than BCash and the gap is widening, not closing.

>There's also good reason why it's only Bitcoin cash that gets this type of flack from Bitcoin core, because it's a real contender that worries you.

I can assure you it doesn't. I'm just fascinated by cults and BCash is almost certainly a cult in the making. You have all the dogmatism, false idol worship and fake news you need to go full Jonestown. I'm not worried, just fascinated and maybe a bit worried. 

>See you on the flip side, cupcake.

When is the flip happening, my dear? Seems to be taking an unbelievable amount of time for BCash to even get within striking distance. For the past year it's just been dwindling in no-man's land. When will the markets realize how awesome it is?
> there is this tendency with bitcoin to do the opposite of what the charts are saying 

Such as when?

>Plus the bears have been gloating too much lately, and anytime that happens whether it’s the bears or the bulls that’s about the time that a sudden reversal happens

I haven't seen bears coming out more than usual *and* that's not a reliable indicator at all.

Oh man, I didn’t know you’d quake in your boots just because of something threatened you over the internet. BOOHOO. 

P.S. thanks for the downvote, appreciate it you puss
Bcore
how about the BGD? 

oh really? go read through a few recent dailys they are downright ecstatic

like I say, its a numbers game. I'm comfortable with a 4-5% loss if I'm wrong in order to catch a decent enough entry if I'm right. 
Have you read my comments?  Did you see me quaking in my boots?  You gonna dox me too?
Lol, this is so pathetic.
> how about the BGD?

Like I said, this was because close to 50000 BTC worth of shorts had opened up. A lot of people were calling a short squeeze before the BGD. 

>oh really? go read through a few recent dailys they are downright ecstatic

I read through the daily almost every day and I haven't seen what you're describing. In fact, I've seen the opposite. A lot of people confidently looking to enter longs in the range, saying that this is the bottom. Much like what you're saying. Hell, go look right now, several of the newest comments are bulls calling for a breakout.

>like I say, its a numbers game. I'm comfortable with a 4-5% loss if I'm wrong in order to catch a decent enough entry if I'm right.

That's fine but that more has to do with r/r. It's just very difficult to say the charts look bullish right now. They don't. They look pretty bad. 
Yes I have. Clearly you’re worried enough about his dox threat to try and spread the word, seeking retribution as well as an “apology”.
So just to be clear, you are on the side of the guy who doxxed?  
I’m on the side of keeping this thread clean of your bickering. 
Alright then.
